At a daylong jobs summit convened by Gov. Mark Dayton on Tuesday,
If you don't like the crunchy feeling that you get from hanging up towels and jeans, dry them 3/4 of the time on the line, and finish the load in the dryer.
This was a time and place in history
Companies had to change the names when they people started caring about their health. Companies started getting shifty. Hiding the facts. It’s like Kentucky FRIED Chicken is now KFC. They needed to hide the unhealthy FRIED part of their name. They couldn’t just be called KC, because it would be confused with the Sunshine Band. But back to cereal…
Sunday March 18 – Show Open – 10am to 5pm
The group challenge this week takes place at Patina restaurant in Los Angeles, a Michelin star winning restaurant. They aren’t eating there, though; they are in charge of running the restaurant for the night. Tracy and Suzy won the last challenge, so they get to pick their teams. Tracy headed up the Blue Team with Adrien and Jennifer, while Suzy picked Ben and Christian to be on the Red Team.
Today, I want to share a subscription site where you can get shoes. I KNOW WHAT YOU’RE THINKING! Subscription sites are horrible because they make you sign up and then you have to cancel your monthly purchase if you don’t want it and that’s just too much like work. I agree, but I was signed up with a subscription site for a long time and it really wasn’t that bad. I actually enjoyed it and you might, too.
I still say Theatre Ten Ten did a good thing in reviving the play. Theatre is supposed to make us think and debate, and this is the very sort of play that forces the issue. Furthermore, they excel in their production, by doing what they do best. At a formal level, they do justice to the material. Director David Fuller has given the production a stark, Brechtian reality: no set, a staging in the round, a single piano player for accompianament who does double duty reading the stage directions. The cast are all gung ho in their parts. Stand-outs include Josh Powell, a kinetic performer and great singer who brings the agitator Larry Foreman to life; and Tessa Faye who relishes her role as Mrs. Mister, the seductive philanthropic manipulator of churchmen and artists alike, a character New Yorkers will recognize only too well. These and their castmates do their utmost to make the show soar in the few spots where Blitzstein the composer allows himself to inject a playful note into the didactic proceedings. If the cradle rocks at all here it is due to their efforts much more than the rather limited author’s.
For fixed income investors, the word on the Brazilian street is hold on to those long dated bonds because they are about to become a hell of a lot more valuable. Future local currency bond issues in Brazil are going to pay a lot less in interest than they have in several years.
I got this lovely family with 3 children in the studio.
Many people are aware of Nintendo’s ill-fated stab at 3D game play, the Virtual Boy. But few have heard about Illustr8’s attempt at a fully immersive gaming experience. Much like Nintendo, they attempted a very ambitious project with technology that was not fully developed or realized.
Are main functions and qualifications included and current?
Ah, I could go on and on. There are a million and one ways you can bathe. A gazillion rituals and routines for physical health and psychological wellbeing. Me? I tend just to soak and muse; to relax into the breath and to let my mind wander in pleasant places.
Since my Birthday is on the 30th so very close to Thanksgiving,
Sometimes I’m just grateful to get good news.
Students as Researchers
Here are the scorecard notes from the event:
So why the broad term? What’s wrong with the traditional categories (sci-fi, fantasy, paranormal)? Well, I’m no expert but I suspect it has a lot to do with how little “speculative” titles there are in the Christian bookstores compared to those in other genres. Take the Christy Award categories, for example. Last year there were nine: Contemporary Romance, Historical Romance, Historical, Contemporary Series, Contemporary Standalone, Suspense, First Novel, Young Adult, and Visionary (a much better word for Speculative). This is a pretty accurate reflection of how prominent Contemporary/Historical/Romance is in the Christian publishing world, though to be fair thrillers and suspense have long been on the rise. The problem is also compounded by the fact that most Christian bookstores do not subdivide the fiction section by genre as mainline stores do, meaning that everything is just thrown together into one large section alphabetized by author. Which is great, if you know what you’re looking for, but not so much if you’re browsing for a new author to read.
I decided to use the challenge cut to create a new baby card for my friend Peggy's daughter, who's baby is due very soon. I used the font on the Kate's ABC's cartridge to spell out the word Welcome and also the words Baby Conner. I also used Kate's ABC's to cut the cute Bunny scene and the bunny baby carriage. I chose a the bunnies because Conner is due right around Easter.
Accessories: Grass punch, heart and star punch from Martha Stewart, mini heart punch, liquid pearls, copics and dimensionals.
Whatever it is you are struggling to remember,
Russell Brand stars as a spoiled heir who rebels against his family's plans for his future (which includes marrying Jennifer Garner, who seems to be a crazy lady here) and is subsequently cut off financially. Helen Mirren plays his nanny and also serves as a nurturing mother figure. I honestly had no idea Garner was in it until I watched the extended trailer on imdb.com. She just might be a scene stealer here. I don't think Helen Mirren is known for her comedic skills, but then again, I think her role in this film is to lend it a bit of seriousness and heart. Otherwise it would just be a farce and might not have much depth. All in all, I do actually want to see this one, even though I'm not a big Russell Brand fan. I have a feeling that it will be a sweet comedy and coming of age story, albeit the one coming of age is well into his 30's. I think it'll be funny, endearing, and sweet. My guess: 3.5 out of 5
Info sessions in Padelford C-101: 2/8 at 1:30 and 2/15 at 1:30
Sure, Buddha's celibacy is a lot less controversial in our culture than Joseph's marriages--but I'd rather agree with Joseph that marriage is part of God's plan and deal with the strange baggage of plural marriage than have to disagree with my religion's history on the question of whether family life (including marital sex) is ideal or not.
This means that this eclipse will have an effect on the United States in about six months time, which will be, of course, at around the time of the elections. For a detailed prediction concerning the US Presidential Elections 2012, see my post here:
Please hop around the DT too and leave comments :-) We all appreciate them xx thanks xx :-)
Then who should hang?
Kristiana
Check application for completion and signature as well as paid mark. Choose next bib number in numerical order, assign number to application, write name on back of bib number. Keep applications in order of number assigned. Give bib to applicant. Direct to pins and race bag pick-up stations. Preparation will be made available at a Registration Training session (on race day) with training guidelines sent out previously.
I used to be very loyal to my Purpose face wash until my mom gave me a bottle of this Shiseido face wash recently. Now I will never use any other face wash. It foams up and lathers really well- I hate face washes that do not lather because I feel like they don't get your face clean. This smells heavenly and a tiny squirt goes a long way. It removed all my make-up and made my skin so soft. I highly recommend!
So, when I first read the request for glitter, after I stopped shuttering, I immediately thought of these lovely glass bulbs. The idea of trapping all that glitter inside the bulb appealed to me. These have been all the rage for a few years now. My twist this time, the flattened bulb. Isn't it wonderful? It is also so much easier to put vinyl on something that isn't completely round.
Teas selection
I've been looking through books, and on the internet, and even going to the Surrey History Centre and I think I've now got a fairly coherent account of this most prized of hops.
I never told my parents, though.
Ed says he told the doctor how much stress Nadya’s pregnancies were causing. “Don’t you understand that enough is enough?” he says he told the doctor. “Don’t you see that you are putting so much burden on her mom and on me? Don’t you understand that what you’re doing is hurting the family?”
(The bottom three pictures (that aren’t mine) are from the blog Big Barrels and Air Reverses. I found this blog about a year ago, and I can’t even count how many times I’ve been on this site since. I hope you enjoy them as well.
I doubt Marvel and DC’s lawyers mentioned any of this when presenting their trademark case. “Superhero” is the definition of a generic term. Their companies briefly capitalized on it, but they did not coin it, and its exclusive association with their products was temporary. It wasn’t the case for the thirty years before Action Comics #1, and it hasn’t been the case for the last thirty years either.
“Walk In Their Masquerade,” episode 4 of the serial’s “Season 0″ has just been released, and in addition to the efforts of all the gifted actors lending their voices to this installment, Jay also managed to find a small role for Yours Truly, thereby taking my voice acting virginity. As kradical wrote earlier today:
So I can read you like a book
I’m not sure how this turned into a … girl who is actually a flower? Or is wearing a dress which is a flower — oh my god, I have no idea. Do I ever have any idea? No, I don’t. Things just turn out like this, I’M SORRY! I just never know what I’m doing!
God’s ways are radical and demanding. God’s ways lead to death. Does He love you? Sure, He absolutely does. Much, much more than you can ever comprehend. However, true love demands truth. God’s love is no different. God’s truth is that we all deserve death: not a fancy car, not good health, not dining out at the best restaurants, not new clothes, not physical abundance.
I starve hungry by absence
Here’s you chance…in 7 words express what you do without saying “I” or “me” or your organizations name. Just to make it interesting, answer the follow up question, “What does you organization do” in 7 words.
We’re also promised that further details of the upcoming companion will be revealed soon!
I ordered Turbo Fire!
What so proudly we hailed at
Scalp Itching and Its Causes
It’s sung only once a year, during the Easter Vigil Mass on Holy Saturday.
“You’re telling me that we’re legally obligated and I’m asking you to tell me where this is demonstrated so I can look at it for myself. If I’m honest, I disagree and I don’t believe what you’ve just said to be true.”
So look at this as an option:
As for our loved one Debbie, she came into this world weighing only 2 pounds, starting her life with with both strength and struggle. She lived her life having those two S’s follow her like shadows.
Mark made a train for the kids out of boxes.
#2 – A few years ago, that wonderful husband of mine that I am so fond of mentioning managed to procure tickets (a funny story that involves a gay bar and a man in drag) for my mother and I to go see an advanced screening of Twilight. She and I were very excited to see this movie. We got there early and settled down with plenty of popcorn and Diet Coke, perhaps a little too much Diet Coke. About 15 minutes before the movie was supposed to start I realized that I needed to use the bathroom. I hate getting up in the middle of a movie to use the bathroom, but I also love to watch the previews and was worried that I would miss something since it was so close to starting time. In the end I decided that the needs of my bladder were too great, so I got up and flew to the bathroom.
(2) Pantene = 7.49
Prima Classic Lace Crocheted Flowers (2)
“Praying always with all prayer and supplication in the Spirit, and watching thereunto with all perseverance and supplication for all saints.”
Alla Xul 7" (Gutted Records)
Tweeddale was not hostile to the Restoration regime, but he did have moderate presbyterian connections.
“In Monterrey, people are murdered every day,” Garcia, who pastors Voz Profética church, told The Christian Post. “I often hear gunfire and see dead bodies in the street. Every time we go somewhere, when we get back we give God the glory for keeping us safe.
Contraception is not even a religious matter. Nowhere in Scripture or the Creed is it forbidden. Catholic authorities themselves say it is a matter of “natural law,” over which natural reason is the arbiter—and natural reason, even for Catholics, has long rejected the idea that contraception is evil. More of that later; what matters here is that contraception is legal, ordinary, and accepted even by most Catholics. To say that others must accept what Catholics themselves do not is bad enough. To say that President Obama is “trying to destroy the Catholic Church” if he does not accept it is much, much worse.
And like it they did! In fact, we all fell in love with Debbie Bass; a sweet tomboy who not only has a hard time keeping secrets but dreams of someday becoming an astronaut. Journals of the Big Mouth Bass is a refreshing tale dealing with the growing pains of a 9 year old girl who hates her freckles, is experiencing her first crush and is learning some hard life lessons; “If a secret can hurt someone than it is bad.”
Kiwis
Paul continues:
WHAT? FLYING SAUCER 2009 FALL BEER FESTIVAL
Mondays are always the busiest day of my week and it's likely to improve, so I will endeavor to regain my usual attitude; sunny, yet archly cynical. Maybe I should stop listening to The Sundays right now and switch to Banarama's "Cruel Summer" which is also sunny, yet archly cynical.
______________________________________________
regions of blue ice your eyes
I had the opportunity of reviewing two Abaya's from the collection- The first one is the Pink bordered butterfly one. (see review and pictures here!)
Jillian finishes the thought quoted above with:
some of these bright beauties. In the meantime
I knew nothing of the picture.Equally ,I didnt even know she had worked at The Laura Mitchell.
(this is an imperial steam gauge, the american ton is only 2000lbs, known here as a short ton, the imperial ton, or long ton, is 2240 lbs, whereas, just to confuse matters, the metric ton, or 'tonne' is 1000kg, or 2205lbs)
Photo Session Fee AND a complimentary 16″ x 20″ Wall Mounted Portrait. Great Portraits are
The coffee shop was somewhat busy, but we grabbed an area with some big chairs and a large rug and we spread out (yes, we sat on the floor!). I noticed a few stares, but we didn't mind because we were having a good time. I brought supplies to make some little badges (I made one for me, one for my sis, and one for a friend)...they're easy and fun!
If the spate of summer madness afflicting the Beehive continues, The Hollow Women promises to be a pre-election best-seller.
3. Save the day. She’ll grow up looking for a hero. It might as well be you. She’ll need you to come through for her over and over again throughout her life. Rise to the occasion. Red cape and blue tights optional.
3- Perhaps someone from your “help” desk can contact me via email or this blog. That would be lovely! — L.
I've met Janene in real life and can confirm she's a top woman, a fabulous seamstress and has a penchant for polka dots, which is probably why we got on so well! As part of the award there are a few questions to be answered, so here goes…
On the tax cuts versus spending question we find that every ethnic minority group is less supportive of greater government spending than the white British group. In this respect they appear to be less ‘left-wing’ than the majority, which contrasts strangely with their greater support for Labour but may suggest that those who do not have an affiliation to Labour are more inclined to vote Tory than Lib Dem given our position going in to the General Election. In further items covering different aspects of the left/right dimension there was either no significant difference between the majority and the minority, or the majority was more left-wing than the minority.
These little guys-- did you play with these when you were a kid, too?
“At this stage the suspects cannot be linked to the crime,” explained Mogale. “The docket was perused by the public prosecutor, who declined to prosecute the case and gave instructions for further investigation.”
Occasionally, the lovers meet and spend a few short days together when the ice and snow creep down from the mountains bringing the shadow of winter with them and summer retreats. But it only serves to remind them how impossible their love is and that it is easier to be apart where distance and forgetfulness salve the wound, yet they cannot let go. Skadi is once again alone. Her heart, melted for a short time by the wild abundance of the sea, is made again of the stuff of winter, ice and hail, the grief of passing and she has frozen it over once more. She has returned to hunting the wild, silent places on her skis with bow and arrow, or she fishes out on the wide ice floes where the wolves call and her tears fall. Njord often sits on the shore, soothed by the call of the gulls and the constant ebb of the tide, but he stares out to the grey mountains and the place where his heart has gone.
This doesn't take a lot of things into account.For instance the joy of hot Summer conditions and, that the easiest walking routes are covered in black asphalt. Or that traveling off road can mean climbing hills and, hacking through green under growth. Both will require frequent replenishing of fluids.
What are the offerings you are delivering to the target customer segments that solve a given customer problem in a unique and differentiating way that serves their needs? The simple model above describes an approach to frame the problem for discussion. If you can define how your offering is unique, prove it with financial metrics and customer success, you can then define the sales argument, RFI / RFP, market segment, analyst briefing, etc. in your terms and have a competitive advantage. The idea here is not to expound on Value Proposition Generation as there is much information on this subject.
The Quiet Man.
I was hopping across the country the other night. I was actually on a mission to see if the Canadian UU Historical Society was listed in the links section of congregational websites and if not to send an email to ask it to be added.
Summer Ross
In a break in the court case, which, by the way, gives Casey her first reappearance in a while, Christine meets someone I don’t recognize in a stairwell for a cigarette. In the end, despite that other delivery man turning up, the jury deadlocks and the case is dismissed. The man was one of the jurors, and Christine convinced him and him alone to believe her. With Boyd’s full support, she continues to play the victim all the way out of the courtroom
(3) As far as saying before the High Priest is concerned, the view that Jesus was not speaking literally but was referring to some spiritual triumph is not a new one.
reveal yourself to me
So, I decided to play dumb, and asked, "What's a goth?"
Wilderness – East of Anchorage. No roads, Air & Railroad access only. Estimated capacity of 500,000 Elmendorf AFB – Northeast area of Anchorage – far end of base. Garden Plot facility.
Well, my faithful followers, this is it. I have had it up to here and I am done. Not with blogging. With this provider, Blogger. It served me well until the last couple of months. They made some changes that baffled me. Seriously, why fix something that is not broke.
BRITS: Elderly woman raped and murdered and Okkie Els brutally assaulted by four attackers.
Fish was chosen for several reasons: It was fare that could be eaten by all classes, so in effect everyone would be eating the same types of food, nor was is associated with power, strength, hotness and richness like meat was; indeed fish were both humble and meagre. Most importantly, it was strongly associated with Jesus himself. The 40-day long fast also symbolised a cycle of ‘purification and regeneration’ and fish were considered pure. People always find loopholes however – the rich still ate large grand dishes like roast pike. Indeed anything even closely associated with water was considered fair game during Lent: beaver, seal, porpoise, heron, even sheep found drinking from streams were eaten!
Now, I've read a lot of "romance" novels in my day. In fact, my aunt has written one (available later this month), that would probably make E.L. James herself blush. What I'm trying to say is that I'm not a prude. The sex is not at all my problem with this book.
That’s right folks! In Serano’s version of what he calls “Trans-feminism” (the prefix means: “across,”“beyond,” “through,” “changing thoroughly,” “transverse, ”the “crossing over” of feminism into it’s opposite) the fight against male oppression of females is obsolete! Because such oppression doesn’t really exist! At least not for guys like him. What next? “Strands” of racial justice that “move away from viewing racism as an overly simplistic unilateral form of oppression, where whites are oppressors and people of color are the oppressed’? Because “cis-ethnic” people oppress the whites donchaknow! “Strands” of economic justice that “move away from viewing class as an overly simplistic unilateral form of oppression, where the wealthy are oppressors and poor people are the oppressed”? Because “cis-impoverished” people oppress the wealthy trans-poverished donchaknow.
mām upetya tu kaunteya
PRESSING INFO:
But an hour and a half later, as I wheeled my weary bags back out the automatic doors, there she was. She was still there. Still there.
UPDATE: I've been asked a few times about whether clicking the ads makes me money. The answer is yes, but you can't just go clicking on every ad because you like me. I wholeheartedly appreciate the sentiment, but Google classifies it as click-fraud and I'll get in trouble. However, if you see something that interests you, feel free to take a look at it.
Even as a singular freak of sorts, I think the party was a success. The Draft itself was a snooze: The damn thing starts on Thursday now. By Saturday no one knows anyone who is being drafted, except perhaps a stray kid who made it big in LZ, or a wannabe from a slightly less than average Iowa football team. (McNutt’s an Eagle, fyi).
The Canadian women had just become the first team in history to capture gold at three consecutive Olympics. I agree that they probably erred in going back to the ice, not because of any moral issue but because there area always people willing to see the bad side of everything.
Pantheon Books, New York, 1979
And I also included the theme of the 100th challenge at Cute Card Thursday: metal mania. Use something made from metal - brads, charms... I used brads, a charm and the book corner.
What an amazing example to learn to live like… Jesus!!
No place to walk.
When the outlaws do ride in, the stranger leaves Lago at their mercy. But since this is a Clint Eastwood movie, we know he’ll be back.
I have pretty good restriction at the moment. I'm definitely not as hungry as I reported over the weekend which I think is because I've been out and about these last two days. When I'm home and studying in front of the computer all I want to do is eat. Preparing food is a subconscious procrastination technique. Like cleaning. I never clean unless there's something else I should be doing that I don't want to do or that seems too hard.
Though they weren’t delivered to the stage upon mystical Persian rugs, as was their usual mode of transport in the late 1960s thanks to some hulky roadies, Strawberry Alarm Clock did conjure plenty of magic at its show at the Satellite.
The Hall of Memory was originally erected to commemorate the citizens of Birmingham who died in the “Great War.” Now, the Hall of Memory serves as a memorial for the men and women of Birmingham who gave their lives in the First World War, Second World War and in active service since 1945, including Korea, Vietnam and the Falklands. We were reminded of the sacrifice made by so many, which made us appreciated our own lives even more. We took a few somber moments before returning to the fray of the Market.
Just another thing more wonderful,
We invited her closest friends and family and reserved some chocolate fondue at the Melting Pot. Delicious, melted chocolate. What more could a group of girls ask for?
with long passages about background or travel.
“Never bake while watching football. You may end up toggling the high button when mixing flour….I have a lot of cleaning to do before the wife gets home….oh boy…”
and it made me laugh
Geithner, eh – doncha love him? What does that make his New York regulatory regime in the years before Obama – bargepole?
Anyway, I wonder what would have happened if these students had been followed into grade nine and ten (and beyond)? Would the findings in the California and North Carolina be found again?
VIVA SPORTS TEAM
The studies themselves were brilliantly constructed: In my favorite, participants came to the experiment and had an interaction with a partner who was an experiment confederate. The confederate posed throughout the experiment in either a dominant or submissive posture. Dominance looks basically like #draping, whereas the submissive posture involves pulling the arms inward and curling oneself into a ball while seated. Participants' postures were then recorded during the interaction.
TBI x3, that's me! If you had a Traumatic Brain Injury (or Injuries!) and knew you might not remember dates, events, people, etc., would you live each day differently? Would you give more, forgive more, heal more? I am. The statistics for me developing Dementia or Alzheimer's is a high possibility - one, because of the TBIs, and two - because I'm genetically predisposed.
Talking of wet weather... we've had some sun for two days in a row! *Gasp* It said on the news last night that we've officially had the wettest April on record. Good news is that most of England has now been released from the drought warning. Everywhere that is except... the South East! Typical, not that we need to use hose pipes or anything at the moment... Not that I have a garden that even needs a hosepipe. It just made me chuckle.
Today I tried for something different....no card stock. Remember when cards were folded paper, not simply card stock folded in half? I used a 12x12 piece of scrapbook paper, folding it in half, printing the image (careful to position correctly) and then folding in half again. This adorable image is named Serenity, and definitely depicts my idea of a perfect afternoon. I've only worked with Prisma pencils this time, as the paper is too thin for markers and would surely bleed. I'm really pleased with the result, and think I've found a new use for some of those papers I have stashed away. (lol)
Character Ranking – Mobile Suit Gundam Wing
So that’s it. I typed a little longer, and came up with my answer. No. Anything I reprint will appear as it did originally. Other than a comma here or there, or some formatting problem, I won’t touch it. If I can’t present it with enthusiasm, I won’t present it at all. Period. End of subject.
Surroundings sore you silent.
Although the three I have have successfully wore me out today. Literally, it’s only half past five and my eyes are closing as I type. We went for another Sunday afternoon walk. As I got a jacket I told the kids we were not going on the short walk we usually take. We needed a longer walk today. As we got started I told them we were not taking our usual route, Xavier the leader had to go a different way. When we passed the street we usually turn on and Xavier turned us around, I told him we were not taking our usual route because I wanted a bit longer of a walk. When Xavier began to take the next turn on our usual walk, I asked if where he was going. Back up the street and home, our usual route. I need to talk to his teacher about working on listening skills more. So on the corner Xavier had to make a decision, where was he going to lead that would not be our usual route? He came up with a new route that was over a mile and a half. No problem for him, Austin and I, but Clara quickly decided he couldn’t hang. So for half the walk I carried an extra 35 pounds, that half including the big hill. It’s almost motivation to work out and try to lose that much weight thinking about the difference she makes. Almost motivation. Right now I’m gonna stick with just taking family walks. My current level of tiredness makes me glad it’s Sunday, early bed times for the little people so I can watch The Apprentice.
I have been an avid reader since I was a kid. My mom used to send me off to school on Friday morning with a blank check (gasp!) because that was the day the Book Mobile came to our school. Whoa, did I just date myself or what? Although I spend more timing reading books electronically now, there is nothing better than cracking open a brand new book from Barnes & Noble ... the smell of the ink, the crispness of the paper ... nirvana packed into hundreds of pages. So what does any of this have to do with scrapbooking, you ask?
Grooveshark 762
The stars of the show are Jessica Chaffin and Jamie Denbo who have worked together for several years as a comedy sketch team portraying events from the lives of Ronna and Beverly, a pair of oft-married and divorced Jewish women from Boston who, among other things, authored a book titled, You'll Do A Little Better Next Time: A Guide to Marriage and Remarriage for Jewish Singles." You can find more about these funny women on their YouTube page and read about the pilot in a TV Guide article (1/08/09).
Dacher, E. (2004). Integral health: Health, consciousness & human flourishing. Subtle Energies & Energy Medicine, 15(1), 27-47.
* Party Monster photos courtesy of Killer Films and World of Wonder
We have all wood floors throughout most of the house and have a nice big fluffy comforter folded on the floor in the living room, a comfy place for Summer to sit and play and topple over on her head safely if she reaches just a little too far for a toy. It’s where 90% of the pictures I take with my phone are actually taken. It’s the place where every night she rubs her little red-rimmed eyes and she lays down on her side, spooning me the wrong way so we’re face to face and even though it’s the wrong way, we still fit perfectly like the big spoon and little spoon were meant to fit. She tries to grab my eyeballs before I close them up tight, she giggles when I try to eat her fingers if they get too close to my mouth, she closes her eyes and takes a handful of my hair and rubs it on her cheek like she does with her soft blankies, then she drifts off into sleep until I scoop her up and put her to bed. It’s her little safe place, her cozy spot, a spot made especially for her.
I stood before the grave of William Losze, 1888-1952.
Stars: 4/5
The being seemed to shimmer even brighter, "Yes you may, but remember my warning. You must complete your task before anything else. Understand?"
the US government instead assigned May 1 such comical/Orwellian names as 'Americanization Day,' 'Loyalty Day,' and 'Law Day.' In any case, if you've got the day off or are working an 8-hour day (rather than a 14-hour day, or at least getting overtime pay), you've got unions, socialists, and anarchists of past generations to thank for it.
US Magnum 14.4 % 0.25 oz 17.2 Loose Pellet Hops 90 Min From End
The pew that you stand by
According to a report at davidscameracraft.blogspot.com “The protesters were marching back to Zuccotti Park when the NYPD turned violent. Hitting, arresting and forcing protesters into a small area. At that point a NYPD supervisor yelled shut up to one of the protesters and shot pepper spray into her eyes point blank range and hitting a half dozen protesters (including 3 police officers) when they had nowhere to go. The same supervising officer was seen (photographed) laughing after the arrests while looking at his text messages.”
Jo Ann Walters: All of my work, VANITY + CONSOLATION, DOG TOWN, my early landscape work THRESHOLDS and other side projects can in one way or another be traced back to my experiences growing up in southern Illinois in the 1950’s and 60’s and the choices I made in response to my background.
God bless you all!!
If you write crap, it probably won't sell very well. But you can learn from it and get better. You can rewrite and revise your early work to improve it. With self-publishing, readers become the gatekeepers, and if you work hard, keep an open mind, and learn from your mistakes, you'll improve as a writer.
'Mom, quit!" Sebastian Nicholls is embarrassed by his mother's coddling, "It's just college, I'll be home at spring break,"
My husband was the first & I think will be the last. He has done such lasting damage that I don't think I will ever be able to trust anyone ever again.
somewhere I cannot follow?
Brouwerij Duvel Moortgat NV Duvel
I love how versatile this one-of-a-kind dress can be!
Every camera is different, some of you may find that you are happy with the photos you get just from the light box. But if you are like me you will still want to make them brighter. Part 2 explains how to do this...
Today is blackness without hope,
Our host in Portland, Matt Sage from Bridgeport took us out to Goschie Hop Farm, one hour south of Portland. Gayle Goschie, 2nd generation hop farmer, showed us the ins and outs of hop farming. Recently the big boys have cut back their buying which has brought craft beer needs to the fore. In the last few years, Anheuser Busch have reduced their buying from this farm from 320 000 pound to 90 000 pounds. We saw probably 100 bails of 200 pound tettnang hop flowers sitting in a warehouse waiting to be dumped. It is no coincidence that Gayle will be turning her hop growing efforts to suit the need of the craft beer market.
With that done we now need to create a new layer, firstly make sure that the original colour image is selected, you can do this by clicking on the right tab (you should have two, one colour and one black and white) next go to the layers section, which should be on the right of the screen, then click on the picture you can see, then if you right click you should get a box pop up with various options, you need to select new layer, give the layer a name, like b&w then click ok.
“Macro evolution” (sometimes termed spontaneous generation) “encompasses the grandest trends and transformations in evolution, such as the origin of mammals and the radiation of flowering plants. Macro evolutionary patterns are generally what we see when we look at the large-scale history of life.” Driscoll speaks in his book and says, ” Macro-evolution purports that nothing made everything. Essentially, no-thin causes every-thing to spring into existence, although this is not considered a miracle because there is no God.”
8:50 Chris Dodd is being interviewed on MSNBC about Ted Kennedy. I want to like him; for some reason I just don’t. Or maybe it’s more appropriate to say that I don’t trust him, and he struck me the same way in the Democratic debates last year. But I’ll also admit that I don’t know much about him.
The man who died so that a dream might live,
So you finally found a Pet, and you're aching to use it. But, wow, is it dirty! These cameras are old and probably haven't been used for quite awhile. The first task at hand is to give it a good cleaning, inside and out. To clean the grime on the outside surface, I just use window cleaner and a Q-tip, and some paper towels for wiping up. You can clean the outside without pulling the camera apart, but you will find quite a few places where dust and dirt likes to hide that you can't reach otherwise. Canned air is also useful, but you are really going to give everything the once over manually. The canned air can be used later to keep the dust to a minimum.
De eerste blog candy zit erop en vandaag gaan we weer van start met een nieuwe blog candy. De prijs is een prachtig papierblok van Marianne Design PB7033.
Then all you do is round up the headbands from under the sink, stuffed in drawers, in pockets of backpacks and laying around the floor (since this was the storage method of choice before), and pop them around the can.
Since I got accepted, I would lie awake in my bed thinking and worrying. This program is going to cost more money then what I had originally thought and it made me nervous. I knew I should just trust God, but it is never that easy for me. So I would pray and eventually fall asleep.
III. Third is the song No Banker Left Behind by American slide guitar virtuoso, taken from his politically engaged and critically acclaimed album Pull Up Some Dust and Sit Down (2011).
Monday to Wensday (March 12-14)--- So~~~~~ Me,mom,dad,and kyle went on a "mini vacation" (as my parents called it) and we went to the boat. monday we left around 9am and got their around 11am,so I spent the day Trying to cetch some bait,so I could go fishing! but I only got one little pin fish,my clothes soaked,and a brused pride.Tusday we all went and got ice cream.And after that we went to a bunch of thift stores. (Mostly to find kyle some new clothes...) I tryed to find a pocket watch,but didn't find any for me.And Wensday we got up at 9am to go fishing,but I didn't catch anything.and the sun was so hot,and the sky was clear so I got sun berned......TT-TT..... around 1pm we left and went strait to the church for wensday night bible study.
Once it was nice and smooth, I began drawing my template for the headboard shape. I used a large piece of cardboard, measured to the center of my headboard, and made the cardboard exactly half the width it. I then freehanded the curved shape I wanted:
But when Alice, in a moment of forgetfulness, neglects to renew the lonely book, it is again relegated to a dusty shelf. One afternoon, it is laid out in the sunshine with other volumes at the library book sale. No one seems to want the old, fragile book with the faded green cover. Just as the skies darken and rain begins to shower, the book hears a familiar voice. Alice has returned at last, and this time she’s taking the lonely book home for good! Finally, the book has a forever home where it will be loved and cherished.
1-1/4 cups pomegranate juice
I'd love to know what you found this week. To play along just leave a comment and add your flea market blog post link in the Linky below so we can all check out your goodies. It would be just so sweet of you to link back here from your blog too, so that others can play along. Remember you can play any time during the week! Oh and pop over to Apron Thrift Girl for Thrift Share Monday. Please feel free to upload your fabulous finds to the Flea Market Finds Flickr pool too. Looking forward to seeing all of your lovely thrifty pictures. If the Linky disappears, just refresh your browser.
ADDED: March 14, 8 days later, EC is rumoured to be doing what it should have done months ago, or at least in February.
Unfortunately, the Philippines has little choice but to maintain a high minimum wage thanks to the kind social intentions but lack of economic sense in its Constitution. Unless the country has the wherewithal to rid itself of this and various other irrational legal shackles in that deeply flawed document – an initiative that, sadly, the nation seems to be increasingly disinclined to take – it will never be able to solve the persistent economic inequality that has plagued it for most of its modern history.
Did I buy? I did. Because the impracticality of taking a piece of celadon from High Point to Atlanta to Kansas City with no room in my overstuffed bag was not enough to stop me. It was love at first sight. I fell for every color, every bird, every flower, every butterfly. As is often the case, her delicate appearance masked an inner strength; she rode home quietly, wrapped in a scarf, with Edie to protect her.
Knowing God is the only thing that brings me hope. I have looked for hope in many other places through my life and I have never found it any other place. I think our flesh tries to find hope and love along the way but at the end of the day I rest in Gods love and in the hope that I have because of Him. And nothing else.
At 5 we were cleaning up and heading home by 5:30 (this time we got green lights about half the time) and we had snappy toasted sandwiches for dinner.
Yep, looks level to me, too.
STRUT! The Magazine Issue I: The Stiletto Edition is available now! STRUT Cover Model Priscell “PeP” Prillman is also showcased in the latest edition of N.O.W.- New Orleans Weddings Magazine. Issue I features articles and stories by Yolanda “Yo Trip” Triplett, Kenya Davis, April Sheris, Queen Gloria Lathen, Markisha Fleming and many more positive women whose walk encourages, inspires and motivates. For $10, order online at www.freedomink365.com.
Hey guys! We are the Hardwaverz and together with the Altituderz, we made a very happy and
She actually stole this idea from someone else, but the idea was to post the top ten posts determined by stats. I say screw that, I'm going to post six of my favorites because a few of you folks (if you're still reading by now) are new to my blog and may not have read some of the older shit that I got a chuckle out of writing. So here it is in no particular order, feast my new friends! And to my dear tried-and-true friends, I wubs you, I'll be working on new posts ASAP.
EnchantedWalt Disney Pictures Presents Enchanted
Resections are more dangerous. They have to cut a section of bowel away and join the ends back together again. Cutting through the bowel risks sepsis - if any bowelly matter escapes into the blood or the join leaks, Suey will be in trouble.
We have cold water
funny how something different can throw you...
Oh, and we had moved back to where our families live, so we had lots of help from thrilled grandparents.
"I have found that a lot of the work here is duplicated, or could be centralised." he starts, "There are certain staff that have been here too long, we are using for carriage, and duties where a planet could do on their own for a lot less money."
Yet here in this barbaric world of suburban Northern California do you know what most cafes do? Can you even comprehend the sin?
In my ministry I have seen women go from wearing all black and covering their bodies from head to toe to wearing bright colors and new cuts and no longer hiding behind dark clothing but stepping into who they actually are. It is the rewarding part of my job and my ministry. Watching women come out of the shells they have hidden behind is awesome.
For a nostalgic walk through some of these favorite classis Christmas songs … click below!
These Cookies are not for the faint of heart, and the aroma's of dark chocolate just wafting through your house will have you and everyone in it drooling ,before you even take them out of the oven......In fact excuse me a moment while I go get another cookie after all someone has to taste test........
EPH 5:8 For you were once darkness, but now you are light in the Lord. Live as children of light 9 (for the fruit of the light consists in all goodness, righteousness and truth) 10 and find out what pleases the Lord. 11 Have nothing to do with the fruitless deeds of darkness, but rather expose them. 12 For it is shameful even to mention what the disobedient do in secret. 13 But everything exposed by the light becomes visible, 14 for it is light that makes everything visible. This is why it is said:
Whatever happens 2012 is going to be a very interesting year for books….
If need be a thousand shall sternly immolate themselves for one.
Bottom line: While Plastic Jesus boasts an interesting premise and very well executed characters for a novella, the lack of context (Brite expects the reader to know a lot more about Beatles history than the average Jane) and the relentless pace will disappoint anyone hoping to learn more about the history of gay rights and wanting a little alternate history on top. If it interests you, go for it; if not, you’re not missing much.
Why I love Shugo Chara - the messages conveyed to the viewer
Literally take time out. Escape for 15 minutes every day for a quiet time – reading, meditation, a hot bath, or a power nap can help. Better still, go for a walk.
Granted, it’s wet and miserable at the moment, but as you can see, it’s not so much a garden as a patio surrounded by fence. Now don’t get me wrong, I can see it has the potential to be a truly lovely space. I LOVE courtyard gardens, the more Mediterranean-influenced the better; but in order to achieve this courtyard garden dream (a built-in seating area, lighting, white rendered brick work, potted plants galore and a herb garden to rival Hugh’s), we need some serious bunce. Which ain’t coming our way any time soon.
Chris let it sink in. “What’s your role in all this?”
“You’ve Lost That Lovin’ Feelin’” was provided as a duet between Phillip and Joshua. A bit odd, but both did well.
sarcasm
I am aware that I am not even close to having drunk every beer produced by The Kernel, but to provide that many wows out of may be only 15-20 beers I've tried is more than a little bit impressive.
E (when I don’t share) is for the Envious reaction
292. Bread Board @ Teresa’s Next Door (Wayne, PA) 5:48 p.m.
That same day the old man received another letter from his son.
I’d wanted to write for as long as I can remember. The problem was that I spent too much time wanting to write instead of just writing. I admit I was a little lazy and maybe not yet mature enough to discipline myself. But I also relied heavily on others’ approval. If I sent a story or a poem to a friend to read and didn’t get feedback, I’d shelve the piece. I needed validation to keep writing.
Pre-heat oven to 400 degrees. Cover baking dish in aluminum foil for quick clean-up. Lightly grease pan with olive oil or cooking spray.
On the battlefield of Kurukṣetra, Arjuna was very much afraid of being entangled in his activities by engaging in warfare. Kṛṣṇa therefore assured him that if he fought for His sake there would be no possibility of entanglement.
5. Kill them.
Famous beaches lost blue-water certificates:
Onion;1,chopped finely
To quote John Derbyshire again “The British Empire was, in fact, for all its faults and occasional horrors, a net force for good. I cannot think of any place that Britain left worse- less healthy, less prosperous, less well-educated-than she found it.”
I am a New Englander at heart and sometimes I have trouble relating to San Franciscans, especially those who are are into really new-agey kinds of things, or who feel the need to parade the streets in costume for every little holiday, or who sit in trees for 21 months in protest. There are general things I don't like about this place, like the pale foggy light, the washed out building colors, and chilly weather which means I can never go out at night without a winter jacket. Coming directly from Austin, I was used to pretty much perfect, warm, sunny weather year-round and the climate in San Francisco was definitely a disappointment.
conquer we must, when our cause it is just,
Learning CSS, for example, is time consuming and tedious—much like learning Spanish or another language. However, Apple’s proposed tool would set you up with everything you need to build an app without any previous knowledge.
5. Vanilla really is my favourite flavour of ice cream.
OK before I start talking, about this movie, I just explain why this review was late, between me being at work, and my lazy ass watching non-stop One Piece, I just never got around to writing the review. So I’m sorry for the delay.
- 1/2 onion, chopped
07-The Observers-Ital Observer Style
NBC 15 will air the story at 6:00PM on Monday November 7th, 2011. There’s a preview on their video player on the right side of their home page RIGHT NOW!
SanJAsKa: We do not use those measurements as literal events in your time; we simply use them to measure the amount of perceived time we have been working with these new energy gates. You see dear soul, we do in fact exist outside of your time, and as a result we can spend as much ‘time’ as is needed working on a project. Many of us are in fact assigned to opening energetic gates that served to awaken past generations of your history, as we are able to perceive every decade, every generation of your and our experience all at once. Every aspect of time is accessible as we wish it to be dear one. And thus, we are able to open energetic gates that serve to awaken numerous generations of your time.
Mom, we were in Poison Ivy and there was a clear waterfall, so clear we could hang our tongues out and take a drink.
So now we can all have garlic all year round, thanks to the Chinese and the French..... Why did it take me 53 years to find this out??
How do you tell if a goofy two year old boy is drunk? Is it when he begins to destroy everything? Is it when he can't hold still? Is it when he yells involuntarily? Is it when he begins rolling across the living room floor?
This may be the first time I've ever used the word "tchotchkes," just FYI.
Here is a punch I had at a Baby Shower..
10. Passion (Khusel Shunal) (Byamba Sakhya, 2010, Mongolia) I knew nothing about Mongolian cinema until this documentary about said cinema, told through a lonely road movie, found its way into the program of this year's San Francisco Asian American International Film Festival. Now I want to know more, which is ironic since the film presents a pessimistic view of Mongolian cinema's future. But it's at least caught the fascination of one viewer even more isolated from this nation's cinema than the Mongolian residents portrayed in the documentary.
Pennsylvania State University
This card is entered into the following Challenges:
"I'M SURE! Bring me the yardstick! NOW"
The ending is kinda strange and you should look at it yourself, I won’t spoil it for you. Just one word: confusing.
Oh, that? It’s nothing. Not contagious. –Augusten Burroughs
Israel is, indeed, a vital outpost of Western civilization. That is why Islam conditions the faithful to hate the Jewish state and to view its destruction as an imperative. It is our duty to stand with Israel.
But God commends his love toward us, in that, while we were yet sinners, Christ died for us. Romans 5:8
Interest rates have remained so low for so long that inflation will become a serious problem for America in the months and years ahead. With the price of gold having risen 500% in less than a decade, gold is screaming, “inflation ahead!”
THE PRINCESS'S TREASURE HUNT is a 30,000-word MG fantasy adventure standalone novel with series potential.
This miracle pregnancy + heartbreaking miscarriage has left me with some serious heartache. And like a tsunami it has left a quake of devastation in my life. I had no idea that in a week my life would turn upside down in such a dramatic way, and it has ripped open a huge wound that I’m afraid will take me some time to heal. I think I am a strong person, but infertility has slowly disintegrated some of my outer shell and I feel so much vulnerable now. And I hate how it is affecting my marriage. What a disastrous day we had yesterday on the marriage front. At one point I was so mad at the Huz for not being able to provide the support I needed that I said, “I’ll just pack my bags and fly back to Mexico”….he said, “then do” Ha! not the answer I was waiting for, so for future reference emotional blackmail does not work in this relationship…We had a really long talk, and decided we need to change some things to make sure we don’t hit such a low in our relationship anytime soon. We both agreed that when starting off in this IF road, we had not idea how hard it’d be and what an emotional and physical toll it would take on us. Today it’s been better. But I am still really sad, not depressed, but really really sad about all of this. The weather is amazing today and I have no desire to step out of my home….
If you don’t want to be a princess, my brother will be there, signing his recently released book “Moxie: Maine in a Bottle.” Tact be damned! This is one thing I can’t keep my mouth zipped about because it’s a wicked good book and my brother’s a prince of a guy.
And I do pay out! Ask any of the readers whose addresses I have because I sent them misspelled prizes. Or visit this page.
- Giggles when he sleeps
Welcome to the July Carnival of Natural Parenting: Parenting Philosophy
My coworkers are morons, their personalities grate on me. I am zombified by angst. I want to be drunk but that also provides no real pleasure because my body hates alcohol and my doctor told me to lay off until they know what’s up with my liver.
Joe: Our motto is "Enjoy The Journey" One of the things we do to make our daily travels entertaining is to find an interesting place to have lunch.
Now, there was no harm done; it was fairly easy to pour the stuff back from whence it came, leaving just a little bit in the machine for daily use. But as I was doing that, I was especially proud of my reaction, which went something like this:
Does the driver remove the sign when no baby is present? If not, how are we to know if there is baby in transit?.
In summary, the southern Temple excavations demonstrate what Jerusalem looked like during the ministry of Jesus and the Apostles. The archaeology of the Southern Temple area gives the physical context of last week of Jesus life and the early part of the book of Acts. Let me suggest one application of this physical context to the book of Acts. As is well known, on the day of Pentecost 3000 people respond to the preaching of the apostles and were baptized. In Acts 4:4 and additional 5000 believe. How is it possible to baptize such large crowds in the Temple area? The only real possibility are the many mikvoth around the Temple area, including the pools of Siloam and Bethesda. I think that the baptism of Acts 2 and 3 is a self-baptism in one of the many ritual pools around Jerusalem. In this case, the archaeological context helps explain a detail of the text.
ps: A huge shoutout to the bride's family - thank you thank you thank you sooooo very very very much for making sure I had as much natural light and pretty light as possible to work with all throughout the day and night. It made all the difference. I hope you know that :)
Interrogatory No. 7
The locations of the kitchen, storeroom, attic space and the 2 bathrooms were left unchanged with much cosmetic modification.
To reiterate, here is how Judge Beaty has responded to the Durham argument:
Say goodbye to the long weekdays and hello “Good Friday” and the weekends!
www.daniellethorne.com
I asked the owner of the estate sale company, Guy, if this job made him more of a hoarder or more of a minimalist. His answer, both surprising and inevitable, was minimalist. With a caveat of trying to live by the motto of letting one thing go when you bring another in. Yeah, I've always told myself I do that, too.
THE PRESIDENT: With respect to Social Security, Social Security is not the source of our deficit problems. Social Security, if it is part of a package, would be an issue of how do we make sure Social Security extends its life and is strengthened? So the reason to do Social Security is to strengthen Social Security to make sure that those benefits are there for seniors in the out-years. And the reason to include that potentially in this package is if you’re going to take a bunch of tough votes, you might as well do it now, as opposed to trying to muster up the political will to get something done further down in the future.
We were walking the palaces of Geonju, Korea, and strolling the burial mounds of 1,000 year old emperors and became hungry. I noticed on the map we were right across the street from an area called 'Drunken Alley'. Streets lined with restaurants and bars. They also happened to have coffee houses. The first door we came upon and looking for a light meal, was Coffee Club R. The young man inside said he had sandwiches and light drinks, even cocktails if we wanted.
It started several years ago. At first we thought it was just an affectation. Son C has a lot of those; he had been diagnosed a few years earlier with Asperger Syndrome and mild Tourette's so he has a lot of quirks. We thought this was just more of the same.
If you know any good titles, please suggest some. Some good ones off the top of my head are A Girl Named Disaster and The Ear, The Eye, and the Arm, both by Nancy Farmer. The first is set in 20th-century Africa and is about a girl trying to cross the border to find the truth about her parents. The Ear, The Eye, and the Arm is a science fiction mystery novel, again set in Africa (but in the far future). The Demonata books by Darren Shan also have a mixed-race protagonist, Kernel, if you're into aliens, demons, werewolves, and ridiculously over-the-top gore.
I love these plaques and wanted to share them with you. So to celebrate my 224th post, I am giving away house number 224. To enter, all you have to do is write about how you would use this fun decorative piece. I'll randomly select a winner and announce it next Wednesday, July 14, Bastille Day!
﻿Two years ago today Daniel proposed to me.
Strawberries are in season. They are not quite sweet yet in California, but getting sweeter every week. This is the first dessert I learned to make (along with creme caramel) when I was in culinary training many years ago. It was a very popular dessert in the restaurant where I was working, and we made a lot of them in spring. Plus, I remember when I made it at home for my sisters they loved it. It was the first time I received a compliment from my sisters... so this dessert is a bit nostalgic for me.
Vinicius Andrade Pereira, Rio de Janeiro State University. Communication Technologies as Grammars: Medium, Content and Message in Marshall McLuhan’s Work
I am honored to be part of the Huge JustRite MegaBlog hop. Be sure to check out all of the blogs as there are a ton of them . The stamps and finished projects are amazing (see list below)
But that is nothing compared to my next trick. Stay tuned. Interesting things are brewing for this Tart! A huge big event, the biggest and most original one yet! Yes, I am being cryptic, yes I am a tease..what else would you expect from a tart?
Paul Kasey – Cyberman
With all that being said,India-US relations are going downhill.Our military relations are poor if we were to be honest.The Pentagon and the US military's perverse encouragement of Pakistan in spite of its open perfidy has observers in India saying that the US is back to playing its old strategic games in the region.
I have the most incredible, wonderful news readers: I've got about eight days of work left. EIGHT DAYS mother fuckers. Sixy-four hours of time left on my sentence and then I never have to set another foot in that maudit place again! It's over two weeks, but still... pretty damn sweet. So sweet that I decided, that even though I've been through hell the last year, and I'm nursing a slow-recovery to this awful cold business, we could all use a little more sweetness.
Well, I did say it was a fable. We all know that the real ending would involve the bankers using the toxic-smeared leaders to shepherd the toxic-averse survivors into
It's been quite a while since I've done a giveaway and I do believe y'all deserve one!!
Total 6 mini cakes
Stat-wise, it’s got high Attack, but not much Defenses.
” A right concept of God is basic not only to systematic theology but to practical everyday living. Were we able to extract from any man a complete answer to the question what comes into your mind when you think about God?We might predict with certainty the spiritual future of that man. Low views of God destroy the gospel for all who hold them.” A.W.Tozer
Only in Hollywood!
Unfortunately, this combined with the late night snack, a peanut butter and jelly sandwich, although not harmful calorie-wise, appears to have been harmful from a fiber standpoint. I would submit that some of the numbers for the meals yesterday are off, by a substantial amount. I’ll have to do a little research to see what the actual numbers are for the bread and taco salad, but the fiber combined with the ruffage of the salad and the higher than normal sugar intake, has had an adverse effect on my digestive system. Five trips to the bathroom before noon isn’t normal! Even with all of the elimination, I still managed to gain three pounds in one day! I am not overly concerned with that as I have to work today and I am sure I will be back to 229 pounds, or less at the end of the day. I may try a quick jog later for maybe a mile to get acclimated to running in the real world.
A most unusual event occurred in the Glade yesterday afternoon — it rained. It’s been several weeks since we’ve had a good rain fall. As I write this over an inch of rain has fallen since it started. Our lawn may actually turn green again.
from H&M:
The sun is not really my thing so I ensured my bit was in the shade. Then, when all had departed, I laid down in the shade of the bench and listened to the radio, as the late sun warmed me.
I no longer watch mainstream news but rely on the internet these days. Our media back home is one big exaggerated piece of work. They’re corporations and in business, people are loyal to only one thing – their own interests.
London tubes while
I will be making the butterflies in the sequence they appear in the book. To start with are these three butterflies.
And always remember that you can’t please everyone so just do your best and don’t worry so much.
Jackson was also no stranger to slavery. More than 150 slaves worked day and night at his stately Tennessee mansion "The Hermitage" where cooks prepared his favorite southern foods, including Braised Duck, Chicken Hash, Old Hickory Soup and Wild Barbecued Goose.
rope faster and faster
(Consider: if an artificial monopoly on policing and the provision of security is asserted by the State, the State – in the form of the Police Authority – should then compensate those it fails to provide with an effective policing service. Removing that obligation could result in the Police Authority giving riot prevention and supression a lower priority, since it is no longer directly affected by the consequences of riots, and those who are cannot withhold the tax levied on behalf of the Police Authority.)
(((shakin my head)))
persuading the boys and my husband—
“I… have that authority, yes.” In fact, all the necessary supplies are in the leather satchel he carries at all times, which sits by the foot of the bed at this moment. “But what you’re describing sounds less like demonic possession and more like adolescence, ma’am. I’m sure if you think back, you’ll remember what your own son was like at fifteen.”
Romance, for me, is another really tough genre to pitch because basically there are no new stories under the sun nor is the ending in question.
Deeply inspired by Berry’s article titled “The New Story,” which observed how humans are in between stories–creation stories of the world’s religions and the scientific story of the evolution of the universe–both Brian and Mary Evelyn joined forces to co-write this epic narrative that translates our wondrous connection to the cosmos to a broader audience.
One year ago 12 runners, two vans
I just had a cup and now I'm bright eyed and bushy tailed. I had to have some coffee because I was somewhat discombobulated by the unofficial nap that I took on top of the duvet but under the red fleece blanket in the company of the dog. Since it is a cold day, I had also turned on the heater so the apartment was nice and warm and consequently my nap lasted longer than I had intended.
Luis Alfonso Chimbo, 39, New York, N.Y.
“Singaporeans use simple Chinese script and can speak Mandarin and as such, PRC students who studied in Singapore should have an easier time adapting compared to Hong Kong or Taiwan. Yet, they are still able to cause people to hate them, really have to salute our mainland friends.”
These women believe that all of life’s circumstances are given by God, good ones as well as hard ones. Even Alzheimer’s . They yield to things out of their control. They don’t’ struggle and fight against them, like I do.
This giveaway will end Jan 1 and the winner will be chosen by random. Please leave a seperate comment for each entry. The winner will be notified by email.
03. Gypsy Eyes - diff. mix two guitars
I have recently invited a friend to join Pinterest and observed how she used it – when things got bad or unpleasant, she turned to Pinterest. It soon became a hobby – She put up pictures on her pinboards, tagged friends, and most of the time laughed after a brief “pinning routine”. It is easy to use, hassle-free and you get to write short comments beneath the pictures. I am an advocate of writing meaningful comments below each picture – afterall, a picture can speak a thousand words but it doesn’t tell us what you think of it. Don’t just put a heart, don’t just put a smile. Tell us where/what the picture is, and what you think of it. Share a good thought, with a good picture, for what it deserves.
got broken at dawn
Ah, memories. If you grew up in Britain in the seventies, television was a wonderful thing in the early and late afternoon, crammed with shows whose appeal has yet to completely wane. From the sheer animated eccentricity of "The Magic Roundabout" through to the outer space freaky Socialist moon creature whimsy of "The Clangers", and on to the rather more socially aware "Paddington Bear", it's impossible not to talk about these shows without getting wistful and dreamy. Filled with knowing jokey nods to the adults in the room, the overall concept seemed to be about family viewing, rather than simply sitting children down in front of the television by themselves.
Will you be watching Shark Week this year?
This was to prevent a repeat of what happened this time with Renesas Electronics Corp, whose production of certain microchip controller units (MCUs) is still seen a few weeks away from full restoration.
Hate is a big word. Hmmm... I dunno? Oh, wait, I often hate bad drivers. I learned how to drive from my dad, too, and he's not a very patient driver, so neither am I. Other than while driving, I'm actually a pretty patient person.
But none of those are me.
And some good news...
LANSING, Mich. – Michigan motorcyclists age 21 and older can ride without helmets if they meet certain insurance and training conditions under new legislation, Gov. Rick Snyder said Friday.
The Tallest and the Grandest Love was sharpest, shortest, and light bound.
Kirsty xo
The heart of true womanhood is to understand and agree with the purposes of our Creator. A woman is a true woman when her heart says yes to God
Effective communication in social media requires a need to understand the medium and the audience. And it requires good writing and editing.
I could go on and on and add to the list but truthfully, nothing else comes to mind right now. I’m a simple girl and when it comes to love, I want simple things. And through it all, I’m just grateful because I know that I’ll never compromise what I believe in. I know how I should be loved and how I should give love.
It's quite true that even knowing just a few words in another language opens barriers and Rachels experience in an Ukrainian deli is testament to that. Enamoured by the offerings, she's tried her hand at replicating one of the dishes and created this delightful mushroom salad. At its base is a buttery sauté of garlic, onions and mushrooms and it's bound in a mayonnaise and sour cream dressing.
Today I found that “mixture of honey and cinnamon is known for hundreds of years for their miraculous curing power. If we look back into the history we can see both these items used by different countries and cultures across the world for different medicinal purposes”.
And some people believe that the day of the blog has come and gone and that blogging is dead. (I think it is authors such as myself who are just dog-dead tired of blogging to too many sites!) But with the numbers *stats* so good with all of mine, including this one, I do not know that this belief has any footing.
The Guardian Duke is award-winning novelist Jamie Carie’s most exciting story yet, a uniquely arranged Regency-era romantic adventure where hero and heroine know each other through written letters but have yet to meet.
A career that, nevertheless, would be too short. Her first LP, "Spilt Milk", was released in 1972 and her second and last one, "Colorado Kid", saw the light of day the following year. That's all. Both records have a certain continuity in style and intention, and could even form a double album, even though the second one may be a bit more complex and serious. Hugh Murphy was producing both LPs and even co-writing with Laurie some of the songs. Also the two of them have the sober and elegant orchestral arrangements of Tom Parker and, specially "Colorado Kid", also the instrumental contribution of some well respected session players of the moment like Gary Taylor and Andrew Steele (The Herd), Adrian Legg (his guitars), Henry Spinetti (drummer for half of the world), Chris Stewart and Mick Cox (Eire Apparent), Jerry Donahue (Fotheringay and Fairport Convention), or Mal Luker (The Smoke).
Messes yet to be discovered
To sell now, books evidently need to be big on plot and incident, short on interior monologue - the sort of titles the Richard and Judy Club strenuously promotes.
B1-161
It wasn't a great day for pictures, but I took some anyway.
1 orange - zested, zest cut into 1.5 inch strips
Alfred Molina (Not Without My Daughter)
For any of you who aren’t completely familiar with what a squeeze page is, it is simply a page that is used to entice website visitors to sign up to your email list.
Knowledge is indeed power. So listen here Dr Google and Captain P – you guys are RUMBLED!!!
i know you you'll find another slave
My poor trees. Will they survive? Most will refoliate, but defoliation stresses the tree. I’m concerned about two trees that were completely stripped. We haven’t seen any signs of new growth yet.
making a distinction
Brinson is the Creative Director of Ballard Designs and she does interior design, she just designs – anything, everything. A stylist extraordinaire. There is nothing in her house that just “happens” to be there. It’s all planned and thought out – though probably not even consciously. Styling for her is like breathing. Oh, to be that talented! What a gift from God!
It’s not so much about when he went to Indonesia.
Kenneth held up an acknowledging hand, shutting the woman up right then and there.
Believe me; I’m not making that mistake again.
Event Deadline: 31 December 2013
During the course of trial, Kamaljeet Singh and his sisters Manjit Kaur and Paramjit Kaur deposed that their younger brother was studying with Harpreet Kaur “and she started visiting their residence and came in contact with Kamaljeet Singh”.
What I like about Coke is that it is a brand that has stuck to its mission since the beginning. Their mission is: to refresh the world, inspire moments of optimism and happiness, create value and make a difference, and it can it be recognized in their advertising campaigns.
1. BLACK AND WHITE THINKING: the tendency to categorize things and people as either "all good" or "all bad."
These stamps also coordinate with JustRites custom Spellbinders die template set called
After shocking claims were made today about record levels of Feckless Workshy Families in Britain hitting an all time high of FIFTY SEVEN PER CENT of the population, prepare to fall into a state of permanent indignation when you see the results of the definitive survey of the disgusting material wealth and jetset glamorous lifestyles of Broken Britain's Something For Nothing spongers.
The Whimsy Prize is...
“Goddamn it!” I yelled, which only made them laugh harder.
The inserts were also incredibly simple, which, for me, after an emotional scene, leaves way more of an impression. This movie dives deep into the human heart and mind with wrenching emotion. I’ve never seen something so true.
But understand something. The flowers are blooming. The temperatures are rising. Prom has come and gone. Most of them have their college acceptance letters. There are fifteen days of class before graduation (they are counting, not me!).
1 rendered
Weed (Hangs head.) Weeeed…
Bit of over the top Neo-prohibitionism for you to liven up your Monday
I had an exciting Saturday night. Instead of going out to enjoy a beautiful Saturday evening in Paris, or take advantage of La Nuit des Musees as I did last year, I stayed in, sat on my couch with a bottle of rosé, and made Alex watch the Eurovision Song Contest.
Paul Bissett (Lab) 1230
I've realized how little accessories I have...
And I know most of you are thinking that the big NYC houses would never intentionally hurt an author. Call me cynical but if you believe that, then you haven’t been keeping track of the major lawsuits against publishing houses in the last 10 years. Lawsuits that have been won by the way. Now to be clear, that’s not the norm, but it has happened.
30 days duration. 125px by 125px. CDN$20.00 (paypal only)
Those flaws have been graphically illustrated by the appalling case of Ali Dizaei, the notoriously corrupt Iranian-born officer who was this week sent back to jail for a second time after his conviction for perverting the course of justice.
‘Doctor Nicholls,’ she said when I walked in. She held up her arms and laughed. ‘I’ve grown into my hands again.’
Like Christmas, it is also a tradition for us to make Eid ul Fitr cards for families and friends but I did not make any so far like previous years (you may want to see the previous entry here) because I could not stand the mess in my room. In all honesty, I would never function well if I am not organized (who would?) but crafting is just so addictive that I would only do what I could do in my current condition. I hope the layout above justifies that my skill is still there even though I claimed that it has been deteriorated ;)
Meanwhile, in keeping with my series of Why Doesn't My Newspaper Report on the Important Things, I've found out through Linda Gerber that Brian Jacques, author of the Redwall series, has passed away. I first found out about his work through author and playwright Michel Tremblay, who recommended him at a reading for his own book, The City in the Egg.
The CRB system was established in the wake of the Soham murders of 2002, when Holly Wells and Jessica Chapman, both aged 10, were murdered by Ian Huntley, who had been employed as a school caretaker, despite having faced a number of accusations of sexual assault.
There is no shortage of blogs that wax lyrical about the complex flavours and fruity notes of anything from a pint of cask Ye Olde DogsBollox, or an unusual Belgian lambic, or an exciting hoppy American IPA. Good luck to such blogs, I enjoy reading them.
I pass Mrs Marr her bag of cat food as she opens her front door. "Now you have a nice day OK. And if you’re lucky, I might just go to bingo with you one of these days!”
The three other men grumbled in agreement as they moved like apparitions through the murky water and hanging vines.
budge
The Illusion of Ignorance examines the cultural politics of the American encounter with Porfirian Mexico as a precursor and model for the twentieth-century American encounter with the world.
So, curiosity has the best of me, how do you make your wardrobe decisions?
Chip Jackson - Electric Bass
Kicking off with their awesome début, pressed on baby pink vinyl, we have the mighty "Birth".
Kick a little ass. It's liberating.
This week Angie has been sharing a bit about scheduling in homeschooling over on her blog. So, I got to thinking about scheduling in our home preschool. And I came up with two questions:
For stage three, when you’re ready, take the plunge and write.
I don't really know a lot about this cemetery other than the fact that it opened in 1906.
x4 metres of Blue Gingham.
I went along a seldom walked terrace to find a personal cove.
The gin is made in ‘ultra-small’ batches of only 30 to 60 bottles at a time, using a process that involves taking a very fine copper pot still spirit, which is infused with an array of botanicals including Juniper, Orange Peel, Coriander, Cinnamon, Cloves and Cardamom. The result is one of the only cold-compounded gins currently available. When it comes to packaging, it doesn’t get much better than this either. In fact, the packaging was very much inspired by the fact the gin was so traditionally-made. The bottles are wrapped in brown paper, and feature a print of a beautiful hand-drawing, conjuring up images of the Victorian apothecaries of old. The bottle necks are wrapped with flax twine, which is made using 19th century methods, and each bottle is individually hand-dipped in black sealing wax.
In fact, while J Street supports Arab apartheid in Judea, Samaria and East Jerusalem, there's not a single word about Israel as a Jewish State, merely as a 'democratic home.'
Difficult issues arise because Article 136 has to be read along with Article 153 which permits reservations and quotas in favour of Malays and the natives of Sabah and Sarawak.
It looks like Wall Street workers are starting to feel the financial pain the rest of us have suffered for years.
over these next few months?
For the crust: Pulse the animal crackers in food processor until they are broken down, about 10 pulses; process crumbs until evenly fine, about 10 seconds (you should have about 1 1/4 cups of crumbs). Add the brown sugar and salt; process to combine, 10 to 12 pulses (if large sugar lumps remain, break them apart with your fingers). Drizzle the butter over crumbs and pulse until the crumbs are evenly moistened with butter, about ten pulses. Dump the mixture into the prepared baking pan and press the crumbs evenly and firmly to form the crust in the bottom of the pan. Bake until golden brown, about 18 to 20 minutes (I did 15 minutes). Remove the pan from the oven and cool on a wire rack while you make the filling. Do not turn off the oven.
But, let's be honest, that's the job of youth, and that's really what Nicky Zimmermann was saying. Just the sheer fact of being young - the reality of perfect skin and pursed lips and endless limbs - is enough to render teenage girls with buckets of attitude the coolest kids of the block. They don't have to have a boyfriend with a car, or a skateboard or a packet of gum in their pocket. They can wear whatever they like and with just one wink they capture the attention of everyone in the room. They can even wear pretty-as-you-like florals and flirty dresses and ribbons in their hair. It doesn't matter. As the historic peddlers of beach-ware, now one of the country's most successful ready-to-wear conglomerates (and, in our retail environment, if Zimmermann's isn't a conglomerate, with its multi-store international empire, then what is?), Zimmermann has always known this. For years they have spun stories out of broderie anglaise and lace and sheer silk-chiffon and all of that good, pretty, smile-at-me stuff you want to wear to the beach. It's just that normally it all works best with tousled honey-hued locks and golden tans and a mojito by your side. But, you know what? We think the best way to do pretty is with a bit of an 'up yours' edge. It's my show, and I'm going to be pretty if I want to.
AstraZeneca will acquire Ardea for $1.3 billion. Veritas will acquire Thomson Reuters health unit for $1.25 billion. Nestle won the bidding at $11.85 billion for Pfizer’s baby nutrition unit. Vodafone is acquiring Cable and Wireless PLC for about $1.3 billion. Facebook is paying Microsoft $550 million for a block of 650 AOL patents and access to additional patents, Microsoft owns or licenses over 1200 AOL patents.
We are in our 8th year of marriage.
Since we used vintage wooden tiles, the studio smelled really nice when my daughter did the drilling. Not sure exactly what wood these tiles were made from, but the aroma told us they were quality hard wood.
today was kind of a crazy day, it was a really emotional day but good. I did the usual, studied a lot of ukrainian, wrote my 5 min ukrainian talk, thankgoodness I didnt have to give the talk though cause it would have been bad. I talked to the bishop today cause I've been getting a little home sick so he told me I just need to look for the positive things in life and that I need to relax, he said I am to uptight.
So while Netflix has certainly made some dumb mistakes over the past year and they will be losing some of my business, I’m not blaming them. Hell, the way things are going, they may end up as another carcass alongside the road right there with Blockbuster. If the rumors are true, Sony’s new video game console will somehow prevent people from playing used games. I’m sure there’s some executive somewhere reading about that and thinking “What if we could do that with movies, too?” And from there it’s only a hop, skip, and jump to “Hey, how come we’ve been putting up with this rental nonsense all these years?”
I look down and see what I’ve done. Look carefully in there for precious stones.
Over the past four years our wolfpack has raised over $16,000 for this wonderful foundation and are looking to add even bigger and better numbers to this years donation.
Those who wish to undermine a society are most effective when they embark on their campaign of sabotage in small ways, so that their dark work remains undetected for as long as possible by those they seek to destroy, until the foundation upon which they stand is so weakened that it cannot withstand the final push which will send all which it once supported hurtling to oblivion.
Ah the flipside of reality. Hiding in the shadows, not always seen but there, and we know it.
People’s mic was called to rally protesters to form a human chain around the bus where the detainees were taken. The protesters formed a human chain around the bus chanting “Who’s bus? Our bus!” and held it before police officers broke the human chain, by pushing protesters apart, allowing the bus to progress forward. The next tactic called by protesters to stop progression of the bus was to sit and lay in the middle of the road. The police picked protesters up off of the ground and returned them to the sidewalk. Later the protesters attempted to create a “dog pile” of people which was also broken up by the police. (as seen in minute 7:18 http://youtu.be/YZXff85rMuc) Some citizen journalists are reporting that bystanders were tased as they walked with the bus attempting to stop it. (This video claims it at minute 3:49 http://youtu.be/w8uNP6sHmE4) I was not able to find clear video of bystanders being tased but you are able to hear the sound of a taser in this video at minute 9:00 http://youtu.be/YZXff85rMuc.
And they think that white hood's all they need
You know what they say: When God closes a door, He opens a window.
Taggin all all of your cables – With all of the electronics, cables can easily over take our house and don’t even mention trying to move anything with cables! This is a great idea to get a handle on all of those cables.
Christmas is for family – no matter how big or how small – no matter how far – no matter how near
to keep things whole.
They paused, unwilling to say something that would potentially offend the other.
that I ran through my Big Shot machine to flatten it.
That particular alarm sounds at least once a day, usually set off by some kid waving a book through the sensors for the excitement. So while I made for the front doors, I half-expected to hear the all-clear before I reached them.
Touche', my dear. Touche'.
“CoCo Davis?” A male voice called out in the form of double-doors leading to the dark side of the rainbow.
“That jolly well hurt, you know!” exclaimed hedgehog Kevin. “And you’re playing right into his hands. He wants you to sculpt me into the form of a spiky mammal rowing furiously, because now he can put me into his travelling animal sideshow.”
Total value of the prize is $25. US & International participants welcome. The prize must be redeemed within 30 days of prize being awarded. Any balance remaining will be forfeited after the 30 days.
1) Post your finished piece on your blog, website, Flickr page, Etsy or elsewhere INCLUDING a link back to the Melange Team blog.
Hotels participating in this promotion include:
* program resides. The physical pathname is
The exhibition runs until April 14th and is well worth a visit.
(shirt: land's end, thrifted; scarf: thrifted; jeans: pacsun; moccasins: minnetonka; trench: h&m)
When your mast lost its sail
I'm one of those teachers, so I wanted to share several great resources with you:
The Malcolm Hardee Awards for Comedy have been around since 2005 and, in varying ways, there have been stage shows since then in London or Edinburgh.
Which leads to closing credits. I have many people to thank for this post, and I find it suitable to do so as publicly has I have done everything else in this weird little episode of my life. And you can’t get much better than thanks with hyperlinks.
The New Species
Near misses on the Maggie-Five-Star-Train:
It doesn’t seem like our house! Although most things are as we left them, it feels alien. I hesitate when I want to turn on the oven: how does it work? How mad is that?
But out of three choices, Romney, Santorum, and Gingrich, Romney won with 39.1% of the votes.
The Ace Ale was essentially a stronger version of the Lazy Days, still with that almost treacle sweetness, but not cloying. Its definitely a traditional style of beer, steadfastly and proudly brown in that way that upsets bloggers from time to time.
Amen
Together, they discover what it’s really doing to them.
Odyssey Storytelling is a program of StoryArts Group, Inc. a 501(c)(3) non-profit arts organization. Learn more about us at www.storyartsgroup.org
(*Gulp*)
It wasn’t the longest or the biggest. Sheer terror – that was my first impression. We were warned that it was the scariest ride there. So we watched the kids screaming while waiting our turns. Suddenly the music stopped and the chair rides hang upside down. Everybody went upside down. Screams! For more than 3 minutes. Yes, I counted.
Stone Brewing Co. San Diego County Session Ale-Stone/Ballast Point/Kelsey McNair
Sometimes, the relationship that you have goes
And the other 10-20%? They free choice feed on some high quality kibble. This way they can supplement their caloric needs on days when they have been more active.
to update any other references such as backup scripts, databases,
in hot climes) while their rival
Published with Blogger-droid v1.7.4
Hit Points: 15.
These meetings she’s going to, just don’t really cut it for her, she’s only been 3 times, but there’s a man, a cute man, With dark eyes, large hands, wicked lips and most probably a dark soul that keeps distracting her. She knows she should be listening to how sex is not an important factor in her life, but she can’t help laugh, or even feel a bit sick at the thought. What did they know? Still she’s tried, she really has – she knew she didn’t really have a problem, just an appetite and a healthy one at that. But it was her mother who’d suggested that she needed help. One weekend she’d decided to go on holiday, to escape from the British men and to sample the Spanish delights. Mistakenly she’s left her lap top, address books, and diaries in a place which was easy to find her mother was extremely nosey, she had been since Anna could remember . Always looking through her diaries, her phones, her emails, she was never allowed a private life and as a result Anna became an expert in hiding, lying and most of all doing things that her mother wouldn’t approve of and that was having a lot of sex.
Why recycle? The Earth needs it. Humans are creating waaaayyy too much waste for the environment to handle, and we are rapidly running out of space and resources.
While I enjoyed being involved in setting up for the Firkin Fest at the Green Dragon, I can't escape the sense that there is nobody there that is really enthusiastic about it. I'm open to the idea that my perceptions are misguided, but I felt that the organization of the event, the publicity, and the follow through in producing acceptable printed information for the punters was lacking. On the plus side, it is soooo nice that the setup occurs the night before. This gives me a chance to vent the firkins and determine which are going to be well-behaved or not. After working through the lineup a couple of times, I decided that three of the casks were not going to be suitable for tapping until the morning. A couple of soft spiles overnight, and then I'll see what the new day brings. Out of those, two supplied me with the cellarman's badge of honor upon bringing the mallet to bear on the end of the tap. Good thing I brought a change of clothes.
She nodded. “Yup. You’re wasting your time on me. Might as well go find another girl to charm.”
The story itself is rather disturbing at times, there is a lot of violence, but the suspense that's in this novel, meant that I couldn't put this book down. The ending leaves with a cliff hanger, that makes me really want to read the rest of this trilogy.
Last post I mentioned a plan ‘B’ we were considering. Well…scratch plan B—It just doesn’t seem to be the way for us…for the time being. So, now we are moving on to an alternative Plan B; which I will not go into detail about at this writing. Let’s just say, it would involve putting on our ‘sea legs’? So to speak…
So, that's it...back to square one...what I started doing 5 years ago - trying to find the needle (right manuscript) in the haystack (perfect agency/publishing house).
Some people love leet and text in nothing but. Others hate it and see it as the beginning of the end for proper written English. I think leet is just fun.
This program from the 1957 Ice Follies
Today I would like to talk more about the multiple dimensions of reality, the multiple dimensions of our own being. The word reality is commonly used to refer to that which is solid and tangible. But the physical world is only one aspect of reality, one possible frequency in an infinite spectrum of vibration.
There are many people who are really strifemakers rather than peacemakers.
Caller: What kind of a name is that?
Everything but the card base is from the Heaplet. The blue-ish background paper is from the Core'dinations White Wash pack. (It's real purty.) The yellow chevron is from a left-over piece I printed and used a while back. Source: MelStampz. Even the white banner was in my UFO pile.
The Impotence Pandemic
Some high points:
Ladies and gents, this will be where Ethan and I will be relocating to for the next five weeks:
Yet there are days and times when I reflect on this job and career that I love and all I want to do is pick up my ball and just go home. If it weren’t for my families need for food, clothing, and housing, I might even just outright quit. What makes me so frustrated are the sometimes bizarre ways that schools are run, and the many times backwards, inefficient, and illogical way education itself operates.
I feel like the luckiest mom and wife to be able to be a part of this incredible family. Being a Mom can be hard at times and I am grateful for days like this that remind me why we do it.
drifts into existence, with a few piano plonks and plinks and some harmonious strings
And so to the presents.
With such a high powered line-up of poets and a stellar cast of judges, the energy in the room will be high. And with this being the first event of its kind ever held in Toronto, this is not a show you want to miss.
At Bucksport, Tyler Eddy pitched a no-hitter with 15 strikeouts and he also aided his own cause by collecting a hit, scoring three runs and driving in a run.
My jail experience was pretty bad. I really truly don't plan on going ever again. One of the worst things about it was the deplorable treatment that was given to us by the cops in the jail. They are terrible people. Mean for absolutely no reason. I hate that the people that are supposed to be "protecting and serving" us are all total, utter douchebags.
Next question is what colour to glaze each item in. And so far, I've not settled on a chosen clay body, and I've made NO test tiles.
-label your containers
From the BJF mailbag:
you’ll find your love that stays.
Of all the many media reports concerning this tragedy, there is one that makes the most informative revelations of them all (from a forensic ballistic point of view), and that is the Volksblad report, dated 2012-04-16, compiled by two journalist: Jana van der Merwe and Charné Kemp.
My family always have a birthday dinner and I am also starting to panic about mine in a few weeks as they are all going to notice how little I eat... big time. I get to choose the meal but can't think of anything band friendly that I could eat more of to fool them....how many times can I use the unwell excuse????
And just in case you haven’t seen it yet, check out the full trailer here:
Now for Flourishes pre-challenge Home Sweet Home! Let your creativity shine by being inspired by something in your home - it could be the color scheme of a room, a painting, vase or floral arrangement - the sky is the limit on this Home Sweet Home Challenge! Please take a picture and show the inspiration piece in your post. Entries must be in by May 11th at 5PM EST in order to be in the running for the entire May Release!My creation was inspired by one of the tapestries we have in the front room seen below. This is a large one and the colors are always so inviting along with the scene itself. I pulled the greens, blue and some of the browns out of the tapestry and used Cottage Home as it fits the theme also. This fun shape is using Spellbinders Grand labels One. Added a few flourishes jewels from Kaiser and tied my sentiment panel off with some twine and a button from Basic Grey. I do like how this turned out.
Early in 2005, Welsh film star John Rhys-Davies who played Gimli in Lord of the Rings told “World magazine ”the Muslim birthrate is a demographic catastrophe, I think that Tolkein says that some generations will be challenged. And if they do not rise to meet that challenge, they will lose their civilisation.” Film star John Hurt praised Enoch: “I think he was just saying: We can’t afford to have any more.”
Somebody got us so good
This year is of course the 1st Wedding Anniversary of Wills and Kate the day before ours and the press is speculating as to what they might get each other.. Many other couples around the globe will also be celebrating their 1st Wedding Anniversary too… As the traditional suggested gift is paper maybe it should be tickets to a show/concert – something out of the box…
Earlier Panic Button entries have chronicled the beginnings of this campaign. For details see:
Harvest Menu, providing food from Wisconsin growers such as apples,
You may order from my Stampin' Up! website 24/7 by CLICKING HERE, then click on Shop Now or by contacting me directly. My e-mail link is at the top of the screen.
PS: Congratulations to Rondah, the winner of Andrea Reh's very first giveaway!
Me: That sounds very pretty.
With Thy saints to sing Thy love
All units are relatively economical and low on CO2, however, in part thanks to our idiosyncratic weather patterns. The diesel range opens with the bmw z4 2.0i but that did make us appreciate the few fair days all the bmw z4 3.0 a stabbed rat, whereas the bmw z4 2.0i a car parking space it's worth remembering that you're on your own...
A note about the beans: I’m usually not persnickety about canned vs. dry beans, but you want dry beans here so that they soak up all the flavor of the sauce. Also, the beans cook a long time and they’ll get mushy if you start with canned. Dry beans can be found in the ethnic/bean aisle of your local grocery store, and they are surprisingly affordable when bought in bulk at Whole Foods. Before soaking, sort through your beans, and remove any blemished ones or ones that look icky. If you’ve never done this before, here’s a guide:
When you return, ignore the scruffy people at the door. You will be given a written test. When you have finished your paper will be placed in a device which sends it randomly to one of three rooms. Depending on your results you are taken to one of three doors. Behind one of them your hire car is waiting.
Welcome to my New "Stalk Hop Friday"! It's hosted at: Mrs. Marine and the Tiny Troops, Novel Bloggers, Two Peas in a Pie, and Aspergian Tales! This one is a little different from the usual, instead of just following on Google Friend Connect (GFC), each week the "Follow Theme" will rotate to something different! There will be two linky's each week, one for the Theme and one for GFC! So everyone has a chance to participate!
Eber & Wein, on the other hand, does not appear to have been around for more than a millisecond in schemer time. This cached version (the original listing has expired) of its incorporation announcement reveals that it filed incorporation articles on January 20, 2009--nearly two months after the contest ad ran.
‘And if we’d used the sonic banana – bleuurrgh? Bleuurrgh being …?’
Oh For Gods sake!!
Change is challenging. As a mother, I’m relentlessly assaulted with choice after choice about how to raise and educate my kids. I evaluate each choice. I read a lot. Already I’ve made many decisions (my oldest is currently nine). I frequently find that “the way things are” isn’t good enough and I make decisions that put me well outside the mainstream. This bothers some people (like my mother for example). I feel pressure from many different sources compelling me to conform, and sometimes I struggle to keep the faith. But ultimately when I evaluate the sum of what I know, intuit, and believe, I regain confidence in my decision to unschool my kids and myself. This is my journey.
Today we here at Twine Design are initiating the official countdown to our market debut, starting with Day 3. We are looking forward to Market Street Festival and hope to see you there; let the countdown begin!
(Makes approx. 30 regular cupcakes)
I guess that is how family traditions play out? One card at a time. The chase for the card or the idea to make one. The thought that went into it …and sometimes for lucky girls those cards accompany sparkly things and candy and flowers. ~~That which cometh from the heart will go to the heart.~j burroughs
With the birth of Benjamin coming tomorrow, I have been looking back on my last 19 months of being a momma and reflecting on my journey of learning! I can honestly say that I have learned not only a ton about being a mom, but about myself, the kind of mom I strive to be and my son. I can desire and teach certain things for Jackson all day long, but he is his own person and sometimes you just have to let go and see what he figures out.
~ Add five of her sorority sisters in town for the weekend.
As for me, when I used the word "hate" I may have overstated my feelings. Mother's Day makes me sad and I hate to be sad, but I can't hate a day set aside to honor those women who nurture and love those in their care either through biology or other avenues. I can hate the hype but I don't hate the day. Besides, today is beautiful and it's hard to muster such strong feelings of loathing when the sun is shining and the air is warm.* And my husband sent me cupcakes. Diamonds may be a girl's best friend but cupcakes make me smile too. They don't make me sparkly but they make my stomach happy.
The Oricon Daily Singles Chart has been released and Super Junior’s “Opera” debuted in the 3rd slot by selling 54,331 copies. On most days that would be good enough to take the top spot but popular groups Arashi & NMB48 also released their latest singles on the same day.
During the course of the hearing before the Customs Commissioner, the Delhi High Court pronounced its order in the Samsung case prohibiting parallel imports under the Trade Marks Act, 1999. Apart from the Samsung order, the ‘rights holder’, Dell, also brought to the attention of the Court several other judgements from Indian and foreign courts on the subject of parallel imports being barred under Indian law. The Defendants for their part discussed several case law supporting their defence that Section 30(3) of the Trade Marks Act, 1999 allowed for parallel imports.
"_________ flushed a squirrel down the toilet."
"I'm learning slowly that people will come in and out of your life.. but you have to know who's worth the fight!
You probably already know that many insurance companies boost your rate for getting into accidents. But did you know that traffic tickets can raise your rates, too?
The Encyclopedia Britannica notes that the Boers of the eastern frontier did not own slaves.
The girl stepped to the woman’s side, holding out a trembling hand with the pad in it “No, ma’am. Here is the order, with the date of today and the number of the table”
I originally started writing on my very own ‘antique’ desk – a battered pine desk that my father gave me when I was fourteen and I’d said I wanted to be a writer. A writer needed a desk, he told me and he gave me that one. But these days it’s too small to take my computer, printer etc, so it’s upstairs in my husband’s office and I bought this L shaped desk when we
“Quarantine inspections for the new swine flu on incoming flights will be scaled down now that the virus is spreading rapidly on a person-to-person basis, health minister Yoichi Masuzoe said Tuesday.” Asahi Shimbun reported.
-"This letter is not legalized."
You can find the story here and have the option of listening to it via the website or downloading the mp3 file. The text version is also available as a text, pdf or epub file.
2. The Good Old Days
Bake cookies until cracked all over and tester inserted into center comes out with large moist crumbs attached, 8 to 9 minutes. Cool cookies on baking sheet 5 minutes. Transfer cookies on parchment paper to racks to cool completely.
I cried for them both.
My website will soon be undergoing some drastic changes, as none of my digital
Stamps: Delightful Dozen, Sweet Summer
03 Ties That Bind (3:29)
An American investment banker was at the pier of a small coastal Mexican village when a small boat with just one fisherman docked. Inside the small boat were several large yellow fin tuna. The American complimented the Mexican on the quality of his fish and asked how long it took to catch them.
I'm not the perfect daughter but you loved me perfectly. I can't say that I've never hurt you, I know I have, in words and in actions. But you never stopped caring. Thank you.
We wholeheartedly support Crisis and Shelter's work in lobbying for changes in policy and addressing the need for research in this sector but they are not equipped to deal professionally with the private sector, landlords have been burnt by too many Private Rented Schemes designed by charities who do not understand that the bottom line for every landlord has to be sustainability and to be able to pay his mortgage and related outgoings on a rented property. Too many tenancies have been missold by the Social Lettings Agency model purveyed by Local Authorities. Till you start to engage with the private rented sector, you don't have a chance of helping people on probation achieving successful, supported tenancies with buy in from all the stakeholders engaged. Let's talk, Ms Munro.
Hey, I have some catching up to do. Merry Christmas, Happy Hanukkah, and Happy New Year. Well I have a small break in my school schedule this week. I finished my first year nursing school in December and have already started on the second with an online research class. I finished all the assignments ahead of time so I have a week off. Whoo-hoo!
CRUISED!! For some reason you think you're older than you actually are. You've begun cruising here and there which blew everyone's mind that saw you. You were going back and forth from the couch to the recliner from daddy to Kay Kay. We couldn't believe our eyes! You do know you're a baby right????? Not 9 or 10 months, SEVEN MONTHS. Just so we're clear...
I set out to make replicas of the zombies I had already made because they sold before I could take proper pictures of them but instead I ended up making Prom couples. I think they're all pretty cute zombie couples.
The Center’s first Director was Raymond S. Wright III, Ph.D., AG, with Gerald Haslam, Ph.D., AG, as Associate Director, and Kathy Driggs as Secretary. The Center’s current Director is George Ryskamp, J.D., AG, with Kip Sperry, M.L.S., AG, CG as Associate Director, and Lu Knudson as the Administrative Services Supervisor.
Way to the left is my new PortHole Magazine. I am saving that for our trip to Orlando on Friday.
How can that be?
Round 21 & 22: Ch1. Sc in each dc and sc around. (42 sc)
As a general rule I am not much for tv news anchors, because they always seem to be hushing up the people whose views I want to listen to and they always run out of time after getting a debate going.
There will be a jr high boys softball practice (grade 7-9) on Thursday from 3:15-4:15 at the ballfield in Borden. Players need to bring a glove with them.
2. peel the apples, and then cut them into slices; removing the core.
In a subsequent radio interview, Breytenbach charged: "Critical institutions have practically imploded under our national health system, to some extent our educational system, certainly our security system. It is claimed that even under apartheid more houses were built for the poor than has been built by the new government."
-On 12.25.11 you celebrated your first Christmas! Santa visited and you got your Fisher Price caterpillar, a new toy for your car seat, and a book, "God Gave Us You" (which you love to hear your mommy read aloud). You got your first bible from your mommy and daddy! You were such a happy baby on Christmas morning and throughout the rest of the day! Santa also visited at your grandparents, then you went to MaJo and PaJack's, then you visited Papaw and Gee's, and finally, you ended your first Christmas at your grandparents before coming home. We were busy, busy! (A funny sidenote- You hadn't pooed in four days leading up to Christmas day, which was a big change for you and we called the doctor on Christmas Eve to make sure you were okay. You gave us a present on Christmas and we were all relieved. ;)
Return to heat and cook 2 more minutes. Remove from heat and add butter and
White Labs Hefeweizen Ale yeast
On the plane ride here three lad-bastards on the row next to us. They spoke to be heard. They spoke to harass. They were mouth rapists. Loud. Lewd. They thought they were terribly clever. One of them said: If I ever got a girlfriend I would trap her and murder her, like Silence of the Lambs. I looked at them, I didn't want to look at them, and I felt they were performing for me. I felt their open mouths was causing my mouth to stay closed. Because of the symposium I was going to speak at and participate at, I thought about the effects of such violence. The effects of such silencing.
8) Complete a first draft of my non-fiction project. - Well, I had thought that the main portion of the work was done last week, but I was mistaken. I actually had a bit more to add. That's part of what I've done this week. I've also started on the Bonus Features and lined up someone to do a "sanity check" on the first draft of the main portion. I feel good about the progress here.
Today is my day off. It is amazing and a little sad how much I look forward to this day each week. I am still acclimating to a full time work schedule,and any of you who have done this for years have my total admiration. Between the lack of inspiration I feel every year around this time and the fact that I need to work on prioritizing and getting more done during the work week so that I can do whatever I want to on my day off instead of piddling it away with a zillion little errands that must be done,(and please forgive this run on sentence), I feel like I have been chasing my own tail as far as keeping up with blogging. I haven't created a darn thing for weeks. The house could use some dusting..... you get the drift. So today is my day to catch up a bit. This post will be totally random but sometimes a little random is OK right?
I love the fact that Romero captured the original spirit and idea of the mall so perfectly. The character’s saw this enormous building that was completely self-contained and fell in love with the idea that people could live their entire lives in there and still be alright. I also love that Romero crafts the characters so well that they actually change inside of the mall, and we see them deteriorate as time drags on. Very well executed.
"Last person I would think of," said next door neighbor Judy Brown, who hired Drnek to do yard work and never imagined he'd be accused of bomb making. "He's a nice boy, never had any trouble with him. He's very polite."
Itchy
6. No Boudnaries pleather skirt, $3.99
Palace are taking this showdown very seriously as evidenced by their manager’s decision to rest some key players in their recent 2-1 defeat to Blackpool. Cardiff didn’t have that luxury as they went full strength in their continuing pursuit of promotion, and it paid off as they scored a late winner against Portsmouth to snatch victory.
Goodnight for now, and I will see you bright and early in the morning for a walk! ^_^
It took place at an unknown location where there was a small apartment-like house with only one apartment, it was only a small one floor apartment-like house, and it was in a shotgun style; it was very small with one entrance on the long side of the house on the left, it was a rectangular shape.
“Sharshar then claimed to have learned your location and he lead a convoy of village dignitaries to a certain walnut tree. Of course, when the word spread about the possible search, volunteers joined, eager to help.
This is a common gesture in recent cinema and television. The arrested hero or heroine confronts "maturity" through some task or job, a direction in life. This sense of direction seems to be everything. Or maybe we can say it seems to be everything in this Hollywood material that is not exactly about precarity, but is in fact profoundly informed by it in its premises and in its assumptions. This is, after all, a movie about an adult woman - still youngish - who loses her job abruptly, and feels lucky to get a chance at another measly job, for lower pay, at a struggling organization. This is not "political cinema," yet it is nevertheless a movie speaking directly to a public that knows what it is like to never get a lunch break or to see highers-up freeze pay raises and cut benefits.
The Fabulous Friday challenge this week at Frosted Designs is to create a project featuring things with wings - birds, butterflies, bugs, angels, fairies - anything with wings. For my project, I made a little 12x12 Spring paper "quilt".
looking for the the kitty food, but funny, he couldn't
Early in her career, a critic once quipped that if white bread could sing it would sound like Olivia Newton-John. Though the easy dismissal stung then, Olivia has had the last laugh. Whether she’s singing country or pop, Olivia’s fans love her. She’s sold a 100 million albums, won four Grammy awards and seen 14 of her albums certified gold by the RIAA. Her Asia 2012 tour which began this month will see her catching up with fans in Thailand, Singapore, Malaysia, Philippines, Hong Kong, Indonesia and Sri Lanka where she will perform at the Musaeus College auditorium on April 4 and 5.
She'll be surprised by the amount that our vegetable patch has grown, too, in her absence. I'm particularly looking forward to showing her my courgette.
- Little bit of Yellow Pepper
there is a final hour.
Conclusions:
(Just in time for 1/2 off at Tokyo...YES!)
One last thought: a lot of people have used the word ‘literary’ to describe this book but I’m not sure that’s the right word. Glen Duncan is highly literate, well read and can certainly string a sentence together but behind all the philosophical wrangling this is still a by-the-numbers, plot-driven, action-packed thriller and as pompous as it sounds I don’t think that works in its favour. The review in The Independent says that it’s “a sublime study in literary elegance” and it is but I’d be surprised to see it short-listed for the Man Booker Prize; a Costa Book Award, maybe.
Our knowledge has made us cynical,
captured, and the desire to share swept over me til I drowned in it.
sharp icy bits, which threaten to scour flesh from bone.
or green or blue?
“My son has water for you.”
Engaging Facebook fans and building visibility within this burgeoning social network was the focus of a recent PR Newswire educational webinar featuring Ekaterina Walter, social media strategist at Intel. The presentation was loaded with tactical advice, and framed by two important ideas:
A LITTLE GULL was brought down to Sandford Lake by the showers yesterday afternoon, and pleasingly was still feeding vigorously when I arrived at 7pm. Digiscoping an active and erratic aerial feeder at up to 200m range with no scope adapter and fading light is not as easy at it sounds, but I had fun trying. The bird lacked a dark hood, with just a small dark mark behind the eye, and although the upperwing appeared to be unmarked, the underwing coverts were significantly paler grey than the charcoal grey remiges. To my mind, these two things suggest that it was probably a second-summer bird, and although illustrations and photos of this age usually show a dark hood, it doesn’t seem crazy to suggest that an immature might fail to, or be late to, acquire this feature relative to an adult. The bird was missing a right-central tail feather, in case a similar bird is relocated elsewhere.
I had also lost my 56 year old mom to a horrible 4x battle with breast cancer in 2002 and had never dealt with that. It was she and I in her bedroom for two nights and three days and I watched her have a stroke, go blind and say her last words. In the background people were coming and going and fighting and I was trying to keep her pain away and at the same time feel like I was killing her with the morphine. I begged her to let go...begged.
“If Bernard Manning could tell his jokes to black people who laughed at them, then the jokes were not racist. But that doesn’t mean he could tell them to white people and not be perceived as being racist. So maybe that’s the problem Bernard Manning had and has: that he was and is perceived as being racist. I’m just saying that. I don’t know.
April 9, 2011 10-1 Welcome baby layout and gift set
Eglinton Hill
At this point in our history, one good thing for our American economy is that jobs that involve effective ways of marketing to Americans, is still something we are the leaders in, but that is changing faster than we would like. This country was built on the inventiveness and ingenuity that our democracy encourages, but as we are effective in spreading democracy and capitalism throughout the world, so will our abilities to create. Some of the richest people in the world are now coming out of former and current communist ruled countries. These people were bottled up for years and now they are exploding everywhere. They are now owning our sports teams, media outlets and lending obscene amounts of money to our COUNTRY for that matter, because of THEIR inventiveness and creativity!
2. Frustration from baby when he can’t pick them up without squishing
Available Techniques
Specific jurisdiction is now a very hot topic in copyright law, following the American Buddha case (more on American Buddha here or scroll down to the bottom of the blog and select "American Buddha"). The issue is whether New York or California long-arm statutes will permit an exercise of jurisdiction over out of state infringers, so it is an example of federal courts relying on state law for their jurisdiction. The test is "due process" and the citations are to cases that are the bane of first-year law students. In the American Buddha case, the Second Circuit certified the question to the New York Court of Appeals. We are seeing an expansion of effective remedies for New York and California copyright owners for serious infringers who are located out-of-state.
Senior execs for a big US retailer told their shareholders that they don’t expect the Xbox 720 and PlayStation 4 til 2014. That seems like a good guess to us, even though Sony has always said the PS3 will have a 10-year life cycle (which began in 2006).
Kris Aquino’s endorsement seen to double sales of local adult diaper brand
AND I'm just going to stick with a few front of home touches for this tour. Maybe I'll have the rest of our home ready for Nester's party later this week. So here we are. My favorite part of our home to decorate - the door. In the past I've done it big. I've done it burlappy. And this year I went back to nature. My goal in all these looks is to say WELCOME!
DEER LODGE, Montana – A Canadian on death row in Montana for killing two men said he is “horrendously sorry” Wednesday, but the passage of time appeared only to have steeled the resolve of the victims’ families to show him no mercy.
Although Leeds City Council owns the building, it is leased to Zurich Assurance in an agreement spanning more than 100 years, so the authority has no control over the plans (oh how convenient)
Before buying a foundation is important to test it on your skin.
He said that unlike other countries that were plagued by wars, fighting and crises, Malaysians respected each other’s religions and also celebrated each other’s religious holidays.
and the boy.
As in many a ghost story, I froze; my mind struggling to come to grips with what the eyes were seeing. Trying to comprehend how real the moment was. As in all those ancient tales of macabre, I found myself unable to react.
It was -5 degrees. I looked liked something from Antarctica when I took Shane out. My body temperature was up from running so I managed to stay warm. Even my hands made it the 3.25 miles we chugged out. At one point, I looked down at Shane and a little bit of drool had frozen from his lip. He had a snowy white nose and chin. My poor little guy! He did get paw freeze this morning but only for 2 short instances. In conclusion, I managed about a 10 mile run.
Fill a large bowl with warm water. Dip one wrapper in the warm water for 10 seconds to soften. Drain the wrapper of excess water and place in flat on a cutting board.
When we first came to view Bag End it wasn't possible to see into what we now call the Coppice. Heck, it wasn't even easy to get into it without limbo-ing round some huge leylandii and risking life and broken ankles trying to cross uneven ground which had been used as a rubbish dump for goodness-knows-how-many-years.
Hmmmm, that didn't sound good. My immediate reaction was to search for that message online, but I couldn't.... Duh!
Taking the time to create a professional sell sheet can help to focus your work, your editorial pitch and your marketing plan into a cohesive message that helps the readers/editors/agents understand your unique story point of view.
#2 - The other thing I was fortunate enough to be a part of was a wedding of sweet, young friends, under this huge oak tree, at a beautiful park in East Austin.
and do the measly subtraction
There are times, however, when the only way to break the seal is to smash the bottle. This is one of those times.
After I talked to mum I tried to phone dad, but he was busy at work, and didn’t seem that interested in talking. He’s with his first love, his job, and I’m sure it’s much more interesting. So we just said our hellos, and chatted for a few minutes, and then hung up.
Without going into too much detail, if you like adventure based historicals, this one has plenty of it and is a meaty tome. It took me a few days of reading between the overtime and the dreaded real world, but I was pleased by how well the book worked out and how open it leaves itself to the sequels.
The gash on my leg burns and I moan in agony. But it's not the gash that's killing me. It's the infection. I grit my teeth, wanting to ignore it.
Taken: 06/07/2008
15 years of nothing but fun, friendship and laughter.
I love OLOL so much, it’s ridiculous. It’s small, it’s mighty, it has awesome music (thanks to our Minister of Music and chair of Spelman College’s Department of Music, Dr. Kevin Johnson), and it’s got our brand-new pastor: Father Jeffery Ott, a Dominican friar from New Orleans, and our new Assistant Pastor Father Bruce Schultz … not to mention our affable, groovy deacon, Chester Griffin (whose beautiful wife Janis also leads the choir), a liturgical dance company called Amazing Grace, and some highly gifted & competitive sports teams (of which I’m not a member).
Dent May - Best Friends
Ideally, negative protagonists should have one or more of these five traits:
Since that time, I have had the nagging need to visit Bayside and achieve closure. It has been only a small nagging need, however, so it was not until one week ago that on my visit to Flushing, I decided to go all the way to Bayside, Queens and see what the neighborhood was like.
Too many lives have been ruined or lost in a demonstration of psychopathic behaviour by our teenagers, something we do not want to continue.
The government lashes out at us
The second attack on gun ownership is more subtle.
I loved Trent's score for The Social Network last year (by the way, I should mention that he works on his scores with Atticus Ross, they are also bandmates in How To Destroy Angels). But Dragon is on a whole other level. I haven't read the book, but when I do, I will be playing the score -- it really adds to the film, and is almost its own character.
- Japanese surrendered in pairs, the first concealing the second, who had a grenade
"It must take place in a Borg Cube or at the very least a holographic representation of it ." she answers in her firm Seven voice, "The Borg Queen will expect an invitation, so it is rightful you maker her seem at home, especially as we Borg have extended a truce..."
39. Caffeine causes uric acid crystals to be deposited in the cartilage & joints (gout) feet (bone spurs) and kidneys (kidney stones)
To help me correct the errors I've made?
Basil leaves 1 pc
Wed & Thurs May 2nd - 3rd, 9th & 10th 6:00 PM - 9:00 PM
It was true that O’Sullivan was looking for pictures, looking for scenes to present, but what separates him from photographers like Adams and Eadward Muybridge is that his scenes do not register like paintings, they are not composed to have symbolic and cultural weight. One needs only look to Adams’ highly aestheticized and polished Inscription Rock, 1948, a reprise of O’Sullivan’s photo, to see how truly different O’Sullivan’s work can be. The notion of culture controlling and dominating a landscape is met with disbelief by O’Sullivan. Instead he espouses another nineteenth century approach to landscape, the idea of keeping nature wild.
Because I do know it made an impact on this mama...
Perfumes my mom owns: 1 million
Okay, hit me with your questions...
The OHIM have been keeping up too. TMView is celebrating its first anniversary and although not yet comprehensive it is the best way to search for free across multiple country databases. French data is promised soon and we would like see German data so that there is a good prospect of spotting most of the big issues with a prospective new mark in one operation. You won't be able to clear a mark with this alone but you can certainly eliminate some items off a list.
Even some of the so-called progressive organisations like AISA and SFI, while being in responsible positions of JNUSU, are complicit in undermining GSCASH by repeatedly defending sexual harassers even after they were found guilty by this body. Recently, none of these organisations raised any opposition when GSCASH elections too were brought under the purview of reactionary Lyngdoh recommendations. AISA and SFI had already surrendered JNUSU and its constitution to Lyngdoh, and therefore had no issues with GSCASH too being controlled through Lyngdoh. It was only because of the timely intervention of the student community along with DSU that GSCASH elections were separated from Lyngdoh-regulated JNUSU elections, and we now have GSCASH elections which are free from the discriminatory and meritocratic clauses of Lyngdoh. However, we must not forget that while we have successfully defended GSCASH from the clutches of Lyngdoh, unless we continue the struggle against Lyngdoh and intensify the students’ movement, any possibility of progressive change in the campus – including the strengthening of GSCASH – will be seriously jeopardised.
In my taste of comics, one comic strip stands alone. It is the only “soap opera”-type strip that I read. (By this I mean that its ongoing runs are just continuations of a story that began a while back, and, although intended as entertainment, it does not rely on humor to get the reader to come back. And I wish the Inquirer carried it.
Like the weather… What a fool I was to bring my shorts. Rookie move Steffan. SF is just too fickle to be caught with your knees exposed.
you can peel a man away from his show,
“Okay, I’m going to murder you. Yes, sometimes you pick out great stuff, but then other times you argue me into dressing like Rosie Perez. It’s not cute and I am not Puerto Rican. I think my J Lo ass confuses you sometimes.”
I cut my card -OHNO at 5.097 x 10.04 and then cut just the front of the card in patterned paper. I ran it through the Cuttlebug with the flower folder and inked the edges. I then seleced the PARTY smiley and cut at 4.667 x 4.389. It doesn't show up well but there are Stickles. I looked at the phrases and found Rock On. I wanted it to say U Rock and found How Are U and simply hid the parts I did not want then welded URock together and attached it to the front of the card.
FH: They had lived nomadic lives - from when they had left university they had spent their lives travelling and they were lovely, interesting, open people. We lived just three days from where Saddam Hussein was bombing and one of my friends hid in a roof in Kuwait during one of the raids and was not discovered. The country itself interested me - the Sultan of Oman was deposed by his son - this son was educated in the UK and during his rule changed Oman from something biblical - girls were not educated at all in 1960, and boys, educated at Koranaic schools, had to leave the country if they wished to continue their education - to a modern state. I found this fascinating and read extensively about the country.
infrastructure in the last few years.
· Some Like It Haute: Graphite Gray with Holographic Glitter
In the 42-page affidavit, Mr. Okah claims Mrs. Madueke
Multitudes of children murdered day and night, without ceasing!Therefore have I brought forth, and appointed,
My Islam is Lydia Lunch speaking in one monotone tempo
You hear people say now
Not to mention, there’s still the seating chart, the programs, the escort cards, and the table numbers to make, or order, or whatever. They have to be done. A few pounds could go, too…
The choice I had to make was this: do I sit in the tent waiting for the creatures to tear the the nylon and possibly eat me, or do I unzip it and try to be menacing, using only my wits and a flashlight? I decided on the second option, and summoned my courage.
During a meeting in Ciego de Avila with Cuban and foreign students, and civil society organizations, Serrano pointed out that the support for the cause of Gerardo Hernandez, Ramon Labañino, Fernando Gonzalez, Antonio Guerrero and Rene Gonzalez grows every day.
I was there to watch my son graduate.
Tonight, once the kiddos go down, I am out for the count.
"Do you have him? Is he dead? Are you sure? Look again? Okay, now squish him again for good measure. Whew!" It's nice I have a sweet princess of a nine-year-old girl to take care of big manly jobs like this for me, huh?
We had a blast working the antiques show at Round Top/Warrenton! It is a lot of hard work, but we had so much fun serving you all cupcakes, meeting new people, and finding some great treasures in those fields! We will definitely be back in the fall, so be sure to look for us again at Zapp Hall in Warrenton.
Dietary Fiber 8.4 g
We got a text last night from our team leader that we would be making a decision this morning at 7 a.m. Needless to say, I was surprised when I got a text saying that we were still going to go. It was raining in town when we left, but when we were about half way to San Antonio, it cleared up. I knew it was too good to be true so I checked the handy dandy iPhone and this is what the radar looked like.
However, after I walked the first morning, I decided to wander around the resort and take pictures. The resort was small and cozy (apx. 300 rooms) and very easy to find your way around. This is critical for me because I can't read a map -- true story! Anyhoo, I love everything about our beach vacations so it really is soooo much fun for me to take pictures. Of course, we are already talking about taking the punks some day. However, it won't be for a long time. If we are going to spend a chunk of change, we want them to remember it. For now, we will continue going alone. Here is a quick tour of our adorable resort. I am already counting down the days until we go back!
"The most important thing any teacher has to learn, not to be learned in any school of education I ever heard of, can be expressed in seven words: Learning is not the product of teaching. Learning is the product of active learners."
Reactions to this speech varied from “gee, that’s funny” (my first reaction) to “this is what happens when politics is full of turncoats, sigh” to “why is BNP courting these losers, sigh” to “why is everyone focusing on this loser when there are bigger issues”. I have not seen a single reference to the fact that it’s incredibly offensive to use the word tilokwali in this context.
..and this could be a good way to show and tell about the miniatures I make or whatever else may be going on. I make all kinds of miniatures, but lately I've been focusing on miniature butterflies of several breeds in 1" scale (aka God's Flying Flowers), so I'll start there.
Now overlap the petal over the little odd piece and glue
I regret: surprising nothing (and I thought about this for a long time)
The gated grounds, no doubt fortified with the most advanced security technologies, encompass a circular motor court, well-tended gardens, detached guest house, numerous balconies and terraces, a lap-length swimming pool set into a flat, grassy terrace, and a lighted tennis court set directly but well below the residence.
The LORD regretted that he had made human beings on the earth, and his heart was deeply troubled. So the LORD said,
Just as most of us can cook for ourselves, we tend to really impress when we take someone out to dinner with an amazing version of what we might be able to do at home, just done by some one else that does it for a living. Or for those that really want to take it up a notch, they may work from a recipe of a chef they like, not unlike working with a music consultant or production consultant.
There are plenty of positive trends for the country of 85 million people. Half the residents are coming into their primary earning years. And estimates peg foreign direct investment as having tripled from $20 billion to $60 billion between 2007 and 2008.
I continually speak with sales and company leadership about the science of sales of which they usually have no idea about. They don’t have an “inkling” that there is a modern methodology that can break down the DNA of a sales team or a sales candidate in the same way J. Craig Venter broke down the human genome DNA sequence in the year 2000. And the science of sales was actually discovered 11 years before that in 1989, so it’s been around for 20 years!
The ultimate lesson being: YOU CANNOT HELP ANY ADDICT TO OVERCOME THEIR ADDICTION; IF THEY ARE NOT DEAD FUCKING SERIOUS ABOUT WANTING TO BE HELPED.
To Muslims this is blasphemy and to other religions it is incomprehensible. Indeed, Christianity is alone in the claim that the spirit of the living God comes to dwell within His creation. But the consider what the bible says:
And you're waitin' there
They brought language comprised of words like Keaton projected into the sub-units of macrospace
I would invite my favorite director Wes Anderson. I love his movies, he’s a genius. I would also invite Amy Adams and Isla Fisher, so I could spend the night figuring out who is who.
13. Sweet Suzanne (Oberg) 3:31)
Necessity being the motherf***er of invention, I took my first step at becoming an IT adult. I was inspired by my colleague Dean Bunn here on the UC Davis campus who has done incredible scripting to automate and make our IT day a little shorter and easier. Thanks, Dean.
Asset Finance 10
3 – Discovering new flavors. I’ve been drinking more tea lately and when I ran out of the stash of motley bags in the cupboard, I had to venture out for new ones. My how tea has grown! I can’t believe some of the flavors they have now! There’s practically a different flavor for every day of the week! The flavor that I’m hooked on now is Vanilla Caramel Truffle… it tastes as delicious as it sounds.
“Struit insidias lacrimis cum femina plorat,” he said gravely as we half-watched a Coliseum gladiator match. I took my eyes off the game fought between a pair of Retiarii and a pair of Laqueatores and listened. “Is it not odd that Sestillius appeared healthy to us only a short time ago? She has never been close to Sestillius in affection. ”
“And neither the affair’s exposure nor the birth of the couple’s child convinced him that his political career was done. He got a slavishly loyal aide to claim to be the baby’s father. As hard as it is to imagine such sycophancy, it’s harder still to imagine the hubris and entitlement of the leader who would request and be comfortable with it.”
IMPORTANT! Go to the link above where you will find out more about CISPA. Basically, since SOPA didn’t get passed, CISPA is going to the Senate. CISPA will allow for the government and any company to simply take your personal information (including texts, emails, etc.)
As for that quote, I think I’ve found my realist. She definitely has a different mentally than me in terms of how we view things and even how we do things. That could be a cause for concern, but it’s also refreshing in a sense. She makes me realize that I don’t have to be burdened with all these things that I can’t change. She pulls me down from this cloud where my love and caring would be all it takes to make everything better. She’s opening up uncharted waters when it comes to how I care for people and how I treat my relationships. I don’t want to be the annoying gf who wants their partner to tell them where they are at all times… but I do want comfort and assurance that my partner is okay and I think that’s just courtesy. Like I always say.. when you’re in a relationship, you’re thinking for two. Especially if its long distance, where communication is really all we have.
At this point, Dr Whipsnade should have staged a tactical retreat and let the couple sort things out in private. But having swotted-up on the ex-Beatle’s career, he had come prepared with a number of apt suggestions, or so he thought. He pointed out that if Sir Paul returned to England on the eve of his 64th birthday, he might then serenade his lady wife with the words:
The program ranged from Sheppard originals to a line by Freddie Hubbard (once an employer of both Sheppard and Beasley), And the ensemble interaction during the more intricately arranged passages was first rate. But the musical focus of the evening had less to do with complex charts than with some prime, showcase playing from the two principal soloists, Sheppard and Beasley. World class players with impressive resumes, both have enhanced the bands of leaders with far broader visibility. But each can stand on his own – as they did this night – as avid improvisational adventurers. And with the equally intrepid support of Lefebvre and Hass the musical expeditions journeyed through one fascinating musical territory after another.
This solicitor has, like a good few others, wrecked his life in a dishonest attempt to wriggle out of a drink-drive accident. Now he has lost his career and his reputation, and faces jail time.
‘One.’
So, in attempts to detract from the pattern, I've decided to hang stuff on the door. We have a Christmas wreath and a fall wreath, but, as it is getting to be more and more spring-like, those two wreaths just aren't cutting it for me. I found this neat tutorial for a spring-y wreath over at PS Capture the Details.
For more swatches, head on over to BestThingsInBeauty and TheBeautyLookBook. Both have beautiful photos and swatches of the collection. I have also reviewed the blush, highlighter, and eyeshadows here.
I had to change two diapers and give an assist to the potty trained one...
After the coronation, Pepys was also entitled as a perquisite for his role as a bearer to a share in the silver stave mounts and bells from the canopy. We have no idea what he did with his silver, but two of his fellow barons - Creshald and Gawdon Draper, who were from the same family, pooled and recycled their portions. Their silver was made up into a cup engraved with an image of the king's canopy in the latest chinoiserie style. This remarkable object was recently acquired by the V&A. Creshald, who was a baron for Wincelsea bore one of the staves of the king's canopy, while Gawdon, who represented Rye, held a stave of the canopy over the queen consort Maria de Modena.
In fairness, the Church of England has shown willing to make its buildings available as venues for the arts and commercial ventures, up to a point. Back in the mid-seventies German electronic band Tangerine Dream played well-received "gigs" at York Minster and Liverpool and Coventry cathedrals. Last year Laura Marling played at Gloucester Cathedral and every three years the Three Choirs festival is held there and tickets are not only pricey but sold out. It has hosted art installations by Anthony Gormley and others, but these events are the exception, not the rule. The acoustics are probably not ideal for rock music, although modern sound engineering achieves remarkable feats so perhaps it shouldn't be written off. Of course the building's administrators prime concern will be to conserve it as a place of worship for the aforementioned minority, but I'm not sure they can afford to have it all their own way.
Hard to believe that we have been buddies since high school (many moons ago), but it is so easy to slip into that old friendship.
Nyaya, the lamp at the door, shining inside and outside – Maharishi Mahesh Yogi
A year later and I'm dolled up in my gothy hippy gear and perched on a bench in the Leeds Warehouse. It's 1988, Friday night, and the speakers are pumping out indie rock and acid house. Unbeknownst to my retro rock chums, who contemptuously frowned upon any new emerging musical genre, dance became my secret guilty pleasure. I've always been a rhythm girl at heart preferring the actual music to lyrical content so it was only a matter of time before I threw off my guitar heels and strapped on my dancing trainers.
Tony has written and edited more than 200 books for children since his first book was published in 1984. “What really taught me about stories was editing other people’s work,” says Tony, speaking at the September instalment of the SCBWI Professional Series. “I used the lessons I picked up in my own writing.”
USC to award degrees to Japanese interned during WWII
Which comes down to this: I needed a story to promote myself, and it turned into eight or nine plus three novels.
Now, despite the fact that I have my hands down the front of my pants nearly 24/7, I've only ever been caught beating off twice, and one of those didn't really count. I remember, it was a particularly hot summer, and the air conditioning in my hundred year old house didn't work too well upstairs. Neither my brother or I (we shared a room) could sleep. My brother went downstairs to enjoy the cooler air; I turned the fan on myself and suffered. Eventually, I decided that I should rub one out, hoping that the rush of endorphins and such would make me sleepy. So, I turned on my light, read through the passage where the Coach banged his Milf friend, turned the light off and began the deed.
This song by Gotye brings tears to my eyes every time I hear it. This guy on the radio requested it a few weeks ago. His girlfriend had just passed from cancer. Sniff. Yes, I'm a major sap that way. Somebody That I Used to Know.
(1265-1321)
And nobody was excited about doing it. A lot of them did it for several days, but none of them lasted.”
Hyun-Gi has just discovered that Micha is a girl. And as a manager she’s always looking for a new fresh face and a way to make money.
of a sneer –
So that’s my first shawl for my 12in12. It took me two months rather than one but it is greater than 800m and one of the shawls in the challenge has to be that large – at least I’ve got it out of the way early.
Walking down one of the main streets in Amsterdam, I saw P leaning against his bicycle. It was a bit of a strange encounter, because I actually wanted to photograph the guy he was talking to at first, but as soon as I asked him if I could take a few shots he peddaled off down the street for some reason.
* four specialized vehicles including an off-road one especially for forest fires
member of the board of International Textile Group, which is run by
Double sided tape
Our next stop was lunch and it was a good thing I was super hungry.
Keep in mind that the ESL is only an abstraction library—you can connect to the event socket with any socket-capable application, including telnet!
I was recently contacted by Elena Carrera, on behalf of Environmental Defence, about a new campaign that she and her team are trying to build awareness for. This campaign is the “Just Beautiful” campaign whose goal is to get toxic chemicals removed from cosmetics and personal care products. “It urges the government to make sure that all ingredients are clearly labelled and disclosed before products hit the market.”
Battleship: Not so much.
The book is the story of American Kate, a journalist who adores the novels of Jane Austen. She's been unlucky in love so far, and lives in a house with her grandmother who virtually raised her, and mother who is keener on gambling than she is on her family. When Kate loses her job, she embarks of a rather strange adventure (of sorts) - to write an article to show how to get a wealthy man like the heroines of her favourite Austen novels. Kate ends up travelling the world on the last few dollars she has left, but is she going to find the man of her dreams and the happiness she desperately craves? Or is it going to be a big disappointment if she finds out that a rich man doesn't automatically mean her dreams will come true...
you have to make your way all the way back to HPW and then once you are there,
Tape off the bin if you want to use 2 different colors. I just used my cheap white paint I got for one of my school projects a while ago and then used one of my favorite colors right now.
HAPPY INTERNATIONAL TATTING DAY!
Add the onions to the oil and cook, stirring to scrape up any browned bits from the chicken until wilted, about 3 minutes. Add the garlic, crushed red pepper, remaining 1/2 teaspoon salt, and the bay leaf and cook 1 minute. Add the lemon juice, chicken broth, and browned chicken thighs to the pan. Bring the mixture to a simmer, cover tightly, and place in the oven. Bake for 20 minutes, remove the lid and cook an additional 15 minutes, or until cooked through and tender.
Don’t make the same mistake as those seamen. They tried to be saved in their own way and were forbidden to do so. Today also man cannot save himself. There is no salvation apart from it being a gift of God. Ephesians 2:8-9 tells us, “For by grace are ye saved through faith; and that not of yourselves; it is the gift of God: Not of works, lest any man should boast.” Are you trying to be saved today? Don’t try as it is impossible. Instead, simply trust God and His finished work for your salvation.
My parents will celebrate their 31st wedding anniversary on August 7th.
Mini Alpha Stickers – KAISERCARFT Black
Do you ever let your kids take the pictures?
Materials : Quality Spandex Cotton
it covers the Woman’s face.
And then she let the stupidest thing ever flow.
Last weekend at work was insane. I haven’t worked that hard in months. I easily clocked nearly 1000 miles over the three days. At least I earned my keep. Sometimes I worry that getting paid to sleep is going to backfire and cost me my job. As much as I like getting paid to sleep – getting paid to stay awake and drive people all over creation is more profitable for the company.
That was 1974. It’s still true.
Can you just say CAS perfection?? The way Sue graduated the colours and aligned the damask pattern with the hearts is truly awe-inspiring. Then there's this gorgeous layout as well... well done, Sue, congrats!
In prison, if you have visitors, all you do is go to a room, sit, talk and then say good-bye when you are ready or your time is up.
I was lucky enough to win a challenge sponsored by Bugaboo the other week and I could have chosen a hundred stamps - they are all so much fun!
So that was how my first make-up trial went. Anything you like / don't like or would suggest? Please ladies don't be shy... hit me with your HONEST opinions on my make-up so I can bring it to Dev next time she does my trial!
All you have to do is take a chance with me,
The majority of jobs are going to be in Medical, Education, Healthcare, and customized manufacturing. Meds and Eds is a phrase you will start to hear more often.
I thought I would share how we are using some of these herbs in the next few weeks. Today we'll look at oregano. We all know oregano is terrific for Italian dishes like spaghetti, lasagna and pizzas, but it is also good used fresh in green salads. It can also be added to bread doughs for a wonderful herbed bread or pizza crust.
Bill’s reluctance to be a “team player” makes John tense, and the tension shows. He tries to assert himself by cornering Bill, and telling him he is just being too analytical. While there may be some truth to that, Bill will see it as an attack. Bill is analytical, but for John to call him that in such a manner generates no more benefit than if he’d just called him “Obstinate”. Unless the conflict between John’s need for applause, and Bill’s need to not be wrong can be resolved, the project could be in trouble. Because of failing to make it work, John and Bill could be in trouble, too.
Tell me, what will you do
Here's the schedule:
'Tis full three months since I did see him last;
"In church they sing that they will follow Jesus wherever he goes. That's how we should be about Jacob Zuma," he said to loud applause.
In this case, you are using your visited network in Italy. There are over 7,600 miles of shoreline snuggling the montreal italy vacation packages and islands. The Mediterranean Sea offers some fabulous hiking trails where you'll discover the montreal italy vacation packages and at the montreal italy vacation packages in hand to ask Hitler's help and military support. The Allies prised him out of steam and in 1922 became Prime Minister. Italy was the montreal italy vacation packages of the montreal italy vacation packages, which were once as high as 15 % post the montreal italy vacation packages, have been able to make certain that the montreal italy vacation packages of the montreal italy vacation packages. Offering yet more beautiful scenery for your coffee. The Coliseum is an attractive destination because of its most famous export, wine. In addition, tourism is a long peninsula, shaping like a boat. To its west it has the famous white property known as the montreal italy vacation packages of its timeless appeal.
One Hot Pleasure (The Riddler Instrumental) Electronica 130 bpm 6:18
“Macedonians and Albanians have common history. The same rulers ruled and used the same measures towards them both. Whatever the truth about the Macedonian-Albanian relations, it should be viewed from more sides,” Rizvan Sulejmani, professor at Tetovo State University, told SETimes.
39. Molly and Tenbrooks
"Orinoco Flow" by Enya
In March 2008 the school announced that it would close on March 2009.
This soup is healthy, wholesome and satisfying. The perfect combination for a winter warming dish. It is also wonderfully refreshing when served chilled in the summertime.
Good luck and to all of you who are similarly overworked, hang in there. You're not alone.
Because it really is true: Things that are healthy will grow.
When Hubby met an accident and passed away on April 1st, my life has been on-hold. It has been like that for the past 6 weeks now. Some days are betters days... but there are those days & moments that had been quite devastating and difficult.
This is all over the South Korean media today. Even though I’ve not been keeping up with all of the news for several months now (I have a very good excuse… as those of you who follow my adoption blog will know) it’s been patently obvious that something was up for a while – and I’m probably just one of many fans feeling totally ripped off by CNR Media for having paid in December 2011 (I know many people signed up in January 2012 but I was an early bird) for a fan club membership that has yet to materialize.
It's easy to throw a pitty party for myself starting over but I can't. I'm taking every chance to meet new people and throw us into our new community.
The range currently consists of 9 varieties͵ all displayed in photo attached and all available in Dundrum.
The Via Maris ran from Egypt in the south along the coast up to Megiddo in Israel where it split into two branches. The western coastal branch continued along the coast, while the eastern inland branch went through Galilee to Magdala on the Sea of Galilee and then on to Damascus where it crossed the King’s Highway. The inland branch was also known as the Great Trunk Road and was the busier of the two branches of the Via Maris.
“They’re going to put themselves out of business.”
please baby please.
Benz had his 5 monthiversary today, as Ryan put it! He is growing leaps and bounds and it is hard to think back to just weeks ago when he would just lay in one spot. On May 27th Benson rolled from his back to his tummy for the first time and just the next day he was rolling across the floor as his means of transportation. He always end up getting stuck somewhere and lets out a squel for help. He also scoots a little on his tummy every once in a while. It is quite commical as he bunches up his knees and then pushes with his feet and smashes his face into the floor. Poor Guy is going to have to get used to carpet burn.
Right now, Lands' End is giving away a Women's ThermaCheck® 100 Half-zip Pullover to one of my readers. This fleece pullover comes in more than a dozen colors, and regular, petite, and plus sizes. Leave me a comment here and I'll pick a random winner for the snuggly, warm pullover on Monday, November 10.
1. You are a new creation in Christ
And the Harrisburg Patriot-News very obligingly sent reporter Liam Migdail-Smith to try out one of the two prototypes. He chose the one at the Wegmans on Carlisle Pike in Silver Spring Township, and filed this report. The paper's Joe Hermitt also video'd the experience, which you can watch above.
- 50% of the adresses provided have a wrong or no phone number. Yelp, the Yellow Pages or Yahoo present way better results, respectively 7%, 11% and 15% of errors). Foursquare relies on the customer’s accuracy and in this case, they just don’t know the number
Actually, that should be "A Picture is Worth 1200+ Pounds." Here's all 12 runners on Weapons of Mass Reduction, our Ragnar Relay Key West team! What an amazing transformation each and every one of us has gone through! The idea that I've come to this moment in my life just by reaching out to someone on their blog, letting Katie know how much her candor in her daily story-telling means to me, is surreal. I am SO blessed!
When Ralph sat with me 'neath the lime
It won't surprise me if the Colts bow out before reaching the Super Bowl. Last year was when everything had reached its nexus that would vault the Colts not only to a championship but into a pantheon of great teams, until James Dungy's suicide cast a pall that trivialized and ultimately seemed to undo everything. Fast forward to the 2007 playoffs, and the Colts being almost off the radar. Their defense played the game of the season against Kansas City, but does anyone truly think they can keep it up? Still, there seems to be something special about this team, if only because they are now playing from the same point on the field that Indianapolis the City always seems to be playing: not quite good enough for prime time.
In the modern world, moral authorities are proof of a society’s inability to live a decent life. … To have to rely so much on someone like Solzhenitsyn or Sakharov is a sure sign that something is wrong. Nowadays, I can express myself not by quietly identifying myself with a figure like that but by writing, reading, voting, doing business, whatever it is. This is a good thing. Society needs a Solzhenitsyn in a time of emergency, far less so now.
No gender stereotyping here.
Or, another view could be,…“UP OUT OF THE NASTY, COLD, DARK PLACE WHERE YOU ARE NOW!!!”
How precious it was to read her words especially since she passed away five years ago. She had written a note to encourage me with my writing, a passion I had rediscovered after leaving the fast paced corporate life in New York City to raise a family in the Chicago suburbs with my husband. The day after I found my mother’s letter, I received an email from my wonderful agent, Janet Grant who shared the exciting news that a potential publisher had requested additional chapters to review from my first novel.
The boys rode down the highway about a mile to Billy Reed’s gate. Poor old Maud was in a sweat by the time they got there. The barbed-wire gate was about four feet high. Muck reined Maud to a stop and waited for Finn to get off and open the gate. Finn waited for Muck to get off and open the gate. Neither moved, except for shivering in fright. For there, in the field on the other side of the gate, stood Billy Reed’s bull!
Commenting on the findings, Deborah Arnott, Chief Executive of ASH, said:
for example, we go online and we look at lookbook to know what's the latest trends. we get inspired, we hurriedly head on to a shopping mall or blogshop and hang around looking for that piece of clothing we pictured. then we spend money. sometimes distracted punya pasal, solat tak khusyuk. sometimes nak sangat baju tu, sampai solat pun tinggal. the same goes to modelling.
“Come on over here,” the older man’s voice was thick with Cajun drawl.
202 Indian Vibes Mathar (Ballistics In Traffic Mix)
He purchased a full face balaclava and a toy gun before going to JB Hi-Fi and buying a television.
Surely, if these policies had been well managed by L&G, such a large reduction in one year would be unnecessary?
This liberal article promotes the idea that it is OK for us to continue programming our poor children to continue a lifestyle choice of generational poverty, crime and failed thinking that traps them in their circumstance of poverty for a lifetime. In fact, it is even worse; it promotes the idea that it is WRONG to teach kids how to think and live successfully through peer pressure. That is a far harsher penalty than using peer pressure to reward and correct kids for their bad/antisocial/unsuccessful mindset, attitude and behavior.
In this cartoon, from Al-Watan (Oman) (August 10, 2002), Jewish acts are equated with those of the Nazis. This Nazi-type anti-Semitic caricature of a Jew has a hooked nose, a hunched back, has no shoes, and is sweating.
I didn’t want to deter writers from self-expression by following the pack, and I was tired of seeing blogging as a JOB. Twitter, commenting, following, always the same. I was restless and dissatisfied and couldn’t find a place to settle in the writing world. I didn’t know anything about writing, so I began instead writing passionate articles about what I believed writing should be: free expression, no rules, exploration, ingenuity. Blogging by numbers didn’t go alongside that plan well, and I felt irritated and thrust into a rut that had nothing to do anymore with writing. Just following the pack. I was searching my soul — and what it came to was — I didn’t know anything about literature. And I couldn’t be a writer until I’d experienced it. So I shut down the old place, cut off Twitter, deleted everything and became Jillian (my real name) — reader. Explorer, book blogger, lit student, English tutor, person willing to admit she knows nothing.
But that is not enough.
Inspire us at morn with Thy courage and love,
Frankly, I really don’t care.
Five Bridges I Want To Cross
Sam Jackson as Nick Fury finally gets a little more screen time to do what he does best, he plays the spy Fury very well, a characters whose motives your never fully aware of, a manipulating character who throws the heroes together and guides them. Jackson is in just about every film lately but Nick Fury is the role he was meant to play and damn he does it well. Cobie Smulders plays an adequate Maria Hill with the limited screen time she is given though we don’t know too much about the character or her motives, she just doesn’t get enough time to show us much.
My hubby loves these cookies ! I've tried different types he always asks for chocolate chip " cuz you make the best" . So try them see what you think...
Baking for a get-together with my girlfriends can be a welcome challenge at times that really gets me out of my ingredient comfort zone. We have conflicting allergies -- no dairy for an intolerance and an allergy, and no dairy substitutes like margarine or shortening because of my allergies. and no nuts! -- but we persevere, and every now and then stumble upon some great favourites, like Olive Oil Chocolate Chip Cookies and now these Vegan Brownies.
While I was there I coughed up a little blood, and the fear was that the tumor may erode through the lung into a major artery just outside the lung, and if it ruptured I'd be toast. Not good news! Dusty was not a happy camper. I don't like staying in hospitals, but I was finally convinced that it was best. So we went home, had dinner, and went back up Huntsman where I was reinserted into a hospital room. Joy.
“Please, Mr. Sanders. Don’t blame Linden. Some of us saw you coming out of Branch with the soldiers, and I . . . I kind of nagged him into sort of confessing some of it this morning.” She was hanging onto Bennett’s arm despite his efforts to get away from her, and when they reached the hall, she said, “Look, Mr. Sanders, I know you’d like to forget all about it, but this is important to all of us.”
As with the reforms being voted on in Congress and hopefully applied to banks, brokerages and mortgage lenders, charter schools themselves were given a revisit.
I took a scrap of wood and PVC pipe I found in his garage and made a makeshift marker, scribbled the date, and a Bible verse, Matthew 10:29. Jesus said, “Not one bird falls to the ground outside your Father’s care. And even the very hairs of your head are all numbered. So don’t be afraid; you are worth more than many birds.”
You only call her a bitch because she won’t let you get that pussy.
Life without Desserts is no life at all! Desserts create smiles, laughter, and sweet aromas that fill the house with deliciousness.
I relate more to George from Seinfeld when he shared this pearl:
I think I will have to go dried fruit shopping and give the cake a try.
thank you for raising a son who loves and honors women as much as cole. he works so hard so that i can be home with lily, and i know it's because he's seen how influential you have been in the lives of all your children. you are such a big example to me of tenderness, fun, hard work, and true happiness.
My life has been going the same. Except this weekend something bad happened. To personal to post. . . no one knows. NOT EVEN KENYA! *crowd goes in a shock* huuuuuuuuuuuhhh! I am not gonna tell anyone, though. I am only on page 98 of the lost hero out of 553. Long ways to go. Ha.Ha.Ha
On December 11, 1936, Edward VIII of Great Britain made his now famous abdication speech, saying he could no longer continue to fulfill his duties “without the woman I love.” From then on, the story of Edward VIII and Wallis Warfield Simpson passed into the history books as the love story of the century. In the seventy one years, tons of books have been written about the couple, including their own memoirs. Even today she provokes a strong reaction when you talk about her. What is it about this story and this couple that has kept us fascinated for so many decades?
Check out these articles about type used in movies by local font designer Mark Simonson:
Born February 9, 1974, Paul Carberry has inherited a wealth of riding talent from his father Tommy, who won the 1975 Grand National on L’Escargot. He followed in his father’s footsteps when partnering Bobbyjo, trained by Tommy, to a popular victory in the 1999 Grand National. That success came two years after he lifted the Topham Trophy over the big Aintree fences aboard Joe White. His brother Philip is also a successful rider, while his sister Nina is a leading amateur. Over more than a decade, Carberry has forged a reputation as one of the most stylish jockeys – a talent nurtured through hunting, show jumping and point-to-pointing in Ireland. He rides principally for Noel Meade in Ireland. Carberry was Irish champion in 2001/02 and 2002/03. Nicknamed ‘Alice’ in the weighing room, Carberry is a renowned party person and once suffered a bizarre injury when being head-butted in the stomach by a deer while out hunting. He has been successful aboard numerous high-class horses including Harchibald, Iktitaf, Direct Route, Dorans Pride, Beef Or Salmon, Limestone Lad, Go Native, Looks Like Trouble and Pandorama. He has partnered 12 winners at the Cheltenham Festival. Carberry made the headlines for the wrong reasons in 2006 when he was sentenced to two months imprisonment for setting fire to a newspaper on an Aer Lingus flight, although this was reduced to community service on appeal. In October, 2009, he failed a breath test for alcohol before riding at Naas and was banned from riding for 30 days. He has now resolved not to drink again until his riding career is over and has recorded the highs and lows of his life to date in the autobiography “One Hell Of A Ride”, which was published in October, 2011. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 1994 Rust Never Sleeps (Fell 27th); 1996 Three Brownies (6th);
Kate soon will be a woefu' woman!
Schuyler and her small band hurried after Kenneth and his incapacitated companion–whom was ahead by 150 yards. It was no more than twenty minutes–by practice run–to the Express Tunnel.
That said, 4 of you who voted would rather have voted for Eeyore (20%); 2 of you mentioned Piglet (10%), and 1 person mentioned Owl (5%). Poor Rabbit didn't even get a pity mention. (Kanga and Roo have each other, so I don't worry as much about them.)
Here's an example of one that I was inspired to make based on a $15 basket of mixed exotic mushrooms from LaFungHi.
This is a Feng Shui remedy. A few crayons and some tape. Even a Stick 'Em can work. Feng Shui is supposed to make your space cheerier. And your space is a reflection of you. Sometimes we get so complacent, busy, stressed out, we don't notice that our surroundings no longer (if they ever did) reflect who we are and where we want to go. I bet most of us aren't hoping to dock in Heck anytime soon. But if we are not careful, our surroundings might be navigating us there - slowly, silently, efficiently.
1 construct
Welcome to the motherfuckin Jean-Claude show, bitches!
""Bundling by its very nature has the potential to be coercive," says Craig McDonald, the executive director of Texans for Public Justice, a nonprofit organization that tracks bundlers for Mr. Bush. "The money often comes from people who don't want anything except to please their boss."
2 cups sweetened coconut flakes
A Met Office spokesman said: "Outbreaks of drought, heavy and possibly thundery, are likely to affect southern England and the southern half of Wales, during Tuesday.
“It will be a very big deal for Fox. It catapults them to the big league. It can’t get bigger than KJo, SRK in Bollywood,” said Komal Nahata, Film Trade Analyst.
Toast came home, and started trying to talk to me, trying to make me feel better. I pretty much just ignored him. Jen called, and I wouldnt talk to her, I said that maybe she should have talked to me earlier, while she was here. Toast told her, I guess she doesnt want to talk right now, and got off the phone. I told him that they are both fucking idiots. No, I wouldnt talk to her on the phone, but the last thing I wanted was for him to just get off the phone with her, and for her to just be gone. I know that I am completely irrational when I am like this, and I know that it isnt easy for them to know what is going on in my head, but they had both read my post that day (ok Toast hadnt yet, but he would soon, and he knows me better than that anyway), I do not understand how neither of them got what I wanted. That I wanted Jen to come here and talk to me.
However, I was delighted to see that Stardust was one of the featured in-flight movies on the plane from Narita to Copenhagen. I hate flying long-haul and this promised to take the edge off the eleven-hour journey. Unfortunately, I had reckoned without the idiosyncratic way SAS organise their onboard entertainment. Most airlines have a system where you choose the movie, push a button, and it plays from the start for you. Not our Scandinavian friends: each movie played on a continuous loop on its own channel throughout the flight, and to see the whole thing in the right order you had to be lucky and tune in at just the right moment when the film was starting. Needless to say luck was not with me that day, and not only did I miss seeing Stardust, I missed seeing it about five times. This has rankled with me ever since and I was recently pleased to finally catch up with the damn thing.
Reminder: You can now subscribe to ipl2’s newsletter and weekly blog posts via email as well as RSS. The “Email Subscription” feature appears prominently in the upper left-hand side of the page on the ipl2’s News and Information WordPress blog. Subscription is free and open to all!
Tidewater Community College – Associate Vice President for Interactive Communications/Public Information Officer – responsible for overseeing broad portfolio of media relations, web communications, and social media activities – Norfolk, Va. – apply by May 11
Yes, I am being cyberbullied right now, and while I’d love to think that I am six feet tall and bullet proof, it hurts. That the person who is doing the cyberbullying does not know me at all baffles me. It would seem that she is so weak in her own personal character that she is easily swayed by information provided to her by people who are not trustworthy sources of information about me, or are they even close to honest and objective. And yet, she allows herself to be their puppet, or she is just unhappy enough to need no encouragement. I don’t know. I don’t care. In any world, and for whatever reason, it’s wrong.
The above is the link to the site and video.
For many within the Autism community any attempts to find a causal connection for Autism are seen as some form of insult . As if seeking answers in some way denies people experiencing Autism their identity or devalues their different ways of being in the world. For me as a parent I can tell you that this simply is not true. I seek answers because I want to better understand how my son relates to this world.
The next entremet I want to share with you is the chocolate mint entremet. It has layers of chocolate sponge, chocolate mousse and a center of mint mousse. My favorite technique used for this one is the top striped layer!
I am a shopaholic - seriously. I'm useless at saving, cash literally burns a hole in my pocket, and every month I'm down to my last pennies come payday. If I'm gonna go back to college in the future, I need to prove to myself that I can indeed save more and spend less. I will be going cold turkey in February - no spending ANY cash on myself. It's only 4 weeks. I can go 4 weeks without buying anything - can't I??? I plan to document my rehabilitation from day one on here. Every time I feel the urge to spend but resist I'll make a note of the amount I've saved. E.g. If I'm out and about in town and I think to myself,
area.
Tuesday – May 15, 2012
“Black Girls”
Europe and the West now potentially face the most catastrophic disaster of our own making. We have imported Islam in such numbers as to make ourselves a minority within our own lands within the next few decades. In the case of Britain, recent reports suggest the indigenous British will become a minority by 2066. But this is not quite the whole story.
I start to realize a few things.
1/3 cup white wine (more to taste)
Wikipedia says of Desmond Dekker -
Asimov put the issue in pretty stark terms during an interview with Bill Moyers on A World of Ideas in 1988. The exchange went like this:
I know it is not right to judge but, What if I ask from This Hilary the lesbian Hack, what do you know about mother hood? Do you have any kids your own? Do you know the pain of child-birth? Do you know how it feels to carry a baby in her womb for 9 months? Do you know how it feels when breast feeds? I sure don’t and I am sure neither do you. We only can imagine. It is funny that you seem to have all the answers to working mothers when you aren’t a mother to begun with. World respect mothers more than Dads and it is a fact. It is shameful that you refused the God-given Gift of “Mother Hood” to become a lesbian. That is you choice but please leaves our mothers alone.
built because of your love ..
But how do we engage these men? We need to put a little bait on the hook.
Hi, fellow residents of style-blogging land. Sorry for my long absence. And this post isn't going to seem like much of a return. I still take photos of favorite ensembles occasionally, but I have so many dozens of outfits waiting to be blog-shared that I'm sure I'll never get to most of them. Other stuff in life has simply taken precedence. BUT I WILL RETURN TO BLOGGING THIS SUMMER!!! I'll have much more "me" time over the coming summer months than I have had in a number of years, so if I can't manage to fit blogging back into my life this summer, then I probably never will.
But perhaps it’s the most linked to suicide because it sings about the stuff that really matters, and pairs it with music that’s haunting (though it may haunt you in a very different way than it haunts me).
The parleys were full of platitudes, and a lot of words were scattered higgledy piggledy about the resolution of Kashmir dispute. The two high powered executives agreed to obvious procrastination.
physical body this is our teaching tool, simulator
every morning in the white
*Silence*
Not too long ago I witnessed something that illustrates this point.
However, having learned the lesson from Bersih 2.0 the hard way, DBKL is being used as the front to oppose the gathering at the Merdeka Square.
19. Santa Claus Is Comin' To Town - Fred Astaire
Place: Congregational Nursing Home Building
so I will be having a little giveaway
Yeh but you know it’s not the one I had in mind
Working for a publishing company, sure has it's perks!!
Opelika – Military compound either in or very near town.
The bill, including a bottle of Viognier, some cognacs and service, came to £78.
I sat beside them and thought to myself, why am I being left alone? Why do I feel like they are so far away from me? As I sat there and watched them talk, I could do nothing else but play on my Iphone, waiting for the meeting to begin.
My Dad first introduced me to heavy metal from birth. My parents named me Philip Ian , after Phil “Philthy Animal” Taylor and Ian “Lemmy” Kilminster. So grew up with bands such as Motorhead, Black Sabbath, Deep Purple and Led Zepplin. My Dad introduced me to new bands whilst growing up so the hardcore influence I take comes from listening to Biohazard with my Dad. Then the more aggressive vocal style came from listening to allot of death metal. At The Gates frontman Thomas Lindberg is one of my biggest icons I look too. Sharing a stage with him in December was simply amazing.
“Power comes in response to a need, not a desire”.
F: But I guess I got it out of my system.
Or ... if if you can't make the event, look at the HOM web site & donate a few $$. They take cash & "cards". They even have PayPal.
Later on, I shall look up UKIP results so far.
When asked whether he would ever consider foster caring Gareth answered : “Well I’ve got a child at home, Missy hey babe! Yeah it’s something I’d consider, absolutely simply because I know the benefits of it however, I’ll see where my life leads first ! “
"Of course I am! You're a Wilder!" Turning on his heel to deliver his shouted riposte, he was satisfied to see both women flinch back. Hot shame for his consistent failure to remember Taslin for what she was - lethally dangerous and possessed of unintelligible motives - stifled restraint. "How could I do my job if I let you control me like that? And I'm not attracted to you. The idea by itself's insulting."
7. An English Madam: The Life and Work of Cynthia Payne – by Paul Bailey
Hello everone, happy Friday!!!
We're not sure how else to take this remark from the nutjob guitarist and Romney-endorser: "If Barack Obama becomes the president in November, again, I will be either be dead or in jail by this time next year."
When JP. Morgan learned of the true capabilities of Wardenclyffe, the ability to harness an almost infinite amount of power and freely broadcast it wirelessly to anyone who had the proper antenna (with no way to monitor energy consumption) he immediately canceled all of Tesla's funding.
Anyway, the hook that got me in the Keeping Bees book was a recipe for fondant for feeding bees when pollen and nectar are scarce (or as the case is here, non-existent). I tried the recipe soon after we came home, but it was a flop. Does this:
It was an exciting era, to be sure. If you want to know more about it, you can probably ask one of the many current leaders who came into the field as young professionals then – just don’t tell them they may be part of a problem we’re facing today.
Watched the final part of the BBC’s ‘Great Expectations’ adaptation then read the relevant sections of the novel. The novel is often strange in mood, unnecessarily complex in its plotting, and overabundant in its language, displaying all Dickens’s genius for excess, and his struggle to control and focus his material to create moods or subtleties of meaning. Some examples:
it did not seem that they were there naturally,
The English Festival runs from 11am to 5pm with the official opening at 12noon. Entry to the event is free but some activities such as donkey rides, seaside rides, and face painting will have a small charge. All children entering the event must be accompanied by an adult.
Unless you're allergic (in that case disregard, unless you're freaking, psychotically masochistic and like the thought of anaphylaxis) or under that age of one then honey is a wonderful cure-most, not just a tasty treat in teas, on pancakes or on your lover's naughty bits.
Anyway, thought I'd share them, so, erm, yeah.....
“That’s still comparing. We are not them. Stop comparing us. I hate it.”
1 reputable
Kimberly said...
Some Honorable Mentions and Recent Listens:
Denver, CO
He said that a woman broke her leg while a man fractured a hand when trying to escape through a window.
So it snowed off and on for the last two days. Incredibly, there is not much snow accumulated on the ground. The streets are wet, there is a lot of slush but I think another day or so will dry it all up. We are predicted to have temps of +12 by Friday!
The pictures above are all of the same man, John Floyd Thomas Jr, they are all mug shots taken over a forty five year period from 1964 until 2009. Now 72, John Thomas, has just been arrested following DNA tests which have linked him to at least 30 rape related murders, carried out in the 1970's and 1980's. However, those crimes could be only part of Thomas' career, police believe that he may in fact be one of the worst ever serial killers in American history.
For those of us who are fortunate to have regular Internet access — mobile or otherwise — and the basic skills to use that technology, we have unprecedented access to information and texts and media. For example, click on the YouTube video of the Sandra Boynton book again. Go on. Do it. I may own that book (someone bought it for my son for $5.99), but do I really need to own it? Can’t I just sit with him, phone in hand, and play the video from the YouTube player on my cell phone? For those who do not have regular Internet access — the unfortunate souls who may never have the pleasure of reading my rambling discourse — they are being left behind with an utter lack of access to information. As exponentially as the “cloud” is growing, so too is the amount of information to which those on the “wrong” side of the digital divide may never be privy. And how do you catch up once you’ve fallen behind? What of the other three-year-olds who never think to wonder: what is an aardvark? what is gopher? are jackals dogs? do quails quack?
Posted on Tuesday 24 January 2012 - 11:30
ADCC - The Abu Dhabi Combat Club logo is one of the all-time classics in Jiu Jitsu. Instantly recognizable, this design incorporates an Arabic-style typeface with bold reds and yellows. The reference to the original venue of the tournament indicates the importance of tradition, particularly in an Emirate with an influx of hyper-modern buildings.
To add even more fuel to the fire, HFCS is almost always made from genetically modified corn, which is fraught with its own well-documented side effects and health concerns.
Then I saw the doctor himself. I like doctors, by the way. I like them a lot. I think one of the perfect spanking fantasies or role plays would be the doctor/patient one. Anyway, as I sat on the raised leather seat/table and he asked me questions about my eyes, I felt like fessing up right away and saying "I couldn't do the air blowing thing. I'm sorry..." But I stayed quiet.
Assemble all 4 slow cooker recipes in about 30 minutes. Have them ready to throw in the slow cooker on busy week day mornings or use them for easy meals on the weekends.
In an effort to rid their baby of evil, Terry and Arlene decided to have a reverend come pay them a house visit. Reverend Daniels and his wife (and Tara’s mother) Lettie Mae went to their house and sang songs and waved sage around to rid the house of its demons/ghosts.
Last week I attended the seventeenth annual National Congress on Rural Education. My role at the conference was as teacher advisor to a team of nine high school ejournalism students from Prairie South Schools. The students were successful; this means I was responsible for frequently refilling my coffee cup.
going to have to see the world these people are making. I’m just sorry for
So here’s one of the stories I posted about yesterday. I’ve renamed it “The Promise”. It was written for another writerverse challenge using the prompt: promise.
“Body” was a term which the Apostle Paul’s first letter to the Corinthians used to describe the Body of Christ. This term, Body, was used by the Roman Empire to explain how diverse its empire was. It showed how each member of the Roman Empire had their proper place. So, if you are a hand of the “Body,” do not seek to serve other capacities within the empire. To do so would be a revolutionary act. So, while the Apostle Paul’s use of the Body metaphor was to serve as a transformative agent (which I will explain shortly), Rome’s interest for the same was to maintain its status quo using a hierarchial power.
I had two Lawnmowers and an Amber. By the time the final call came, I was too full from lunch and beer to use my last token. Next time I'll be more diligent. Click the above pic to go to Flickr for more photos, if you're into that sort of thing.
Ashar: But why do you want to be a martyr when I am willing to overlook the past? Look, I can have any girl I want. Girls swoon when I look this intense. They jump from bridges. Why does it not work on you, Khirad? Why do you hate me so? Daddy said I could mold you any which way because you are simple, poor, and chaste..
Now, thanks to neuroscience and a greater understanding of how the human mind works we know that we each have a default ‘template’ that is like a computer software program. This template carries hidden patterns in our mind of ‘what to do in every circumstance’ and is the control centre for the decisions we make every single day of our lives. We build these templates are we go through life without even being aware of it and they guide our actions (or inactions) automatically.
Voices from the hallway
68. Most really pretty girls have pretty ugly feet, and so does Mindy Metalman, Lenore notices, all of a sudden. —David Foster Wallace, The Broom of the System (1987)
Yet another shared experience life throws at us to shape the hand we’ll play. With this new element, those who were confident before will either become more so or be shaken into a newly found uncertainty. Those who bluff will either come to terms with what they lack and quit or continue to fraud even harder, so caught up in their own deceptions . Me? I think I think my hand just got a little better, a little closer to what I’ve been hoping for. Now how I parlay this into my move is important. And therein lies my dilemma, for while I may have something, my hand isn’t quite complete yet.
During the Superbowl yesterday, I officially started Operation: Endeavor.
So, do not forget to invite your own angelic self to be with you. This is not your higher self. If you want to think in the way you do, in terms of layers, think of your angelic self as above your higher self and pull them all in—to your core, to your heart, to your feet, to your toes. Because our purpose in speaking of this is for you to acknowledge and to know your own being as well.
campaign had with them.
It doesn’t matter if you sell products online or not, the internet is still an excellent way to attract new business. In fact when it comes to online versus offline advertising, research shows that using the internet is far more advantageous for new businesses than traditional methods.
And then, at around 3.30am he sat bolt upright as the elusive pun finally succumbed to his mind’s coathanger tackle: the Bangla-Dash. Of course – it had to be, even if it meant turning their modest amble into a monumental test of endurance spanning two countries.
PS-- hope no one had too much damage from last night's ridiculous storm at 3am. We had HORRIBLE wind and hail-- and yes I was awake, working on this ol' blog ;-)
The scowl on her face is all Amy, though. “I’m acting weird? Oh yeah. Because I’m the freak of the family.” Her lips part for a second, like she’s going to continue. Instead she whirls to the stove and stirs furiously.
Young Wilcock was enrolled in Project Talent and all the usual horrible things were done to him, as well as being a popular sex slave for the likes of Prince Charles, Henry Kissinger and Gerald Ford. He was trained to be an assassin but did not have the body to be molded into a super solider; his mind was his best weapon. His psychic talents, coming from Cayce inside him, was quite powerful, so much that he was sent to Mantauk and used on the Montauk Chair. He was instructed by Ed Dames on Mars survival and went to Mars with Andrew Basaigo and Barry Soetoro before the great war and masscare, when Mars travel was switched to astral project and holograph tech. Troubled by seeping dreams of all this, in his teens and early 20s, Wilcock drank a lot and used drugs. When he became sober, he explored his psychic powers outside his alters.
- Call 5 new companies every day, 5 past clients;
it was so last minute, so much that i paid for the expedited passport renewal so i would have it back in time to go, but my husband's job sent him to switzerland for training for 3 weeks and i got to go too! i met him there for the last 10 days of his trip and had a blast! it was my first trip to europe and it was so amazing.
I think we can expect more of this kind of behavior.
Review Copy Source: Publisher
Meanwhile, back in 2011AD, the situation gets worse by the day as the recession and the austerity bite ever harder. Fewer jobs mean more tomb raiders. Shortage of cash means fewer security guards. Even the Acropolis, from whence the Elgin Marbles came, is being closed at 3pm on weekends, instead of 7pm, for want of staff.
A week ago, common office manager Paul Tannenbaum was not thinking about talking about the potential of re-working Revis’ offer.
Preheat oven to fanbake 200 degrees celsius
This figure has been wildly inflated. Although the present government is particularly feckless, everyone knows we were pretty useless too the last time we were in power so we probably won’t gain as many seats as people think we will.
It’s good to keep in mind, that some of the nutritive value of the food is affected by the dehydration process.
Keep smiling, as long as the stars keep shinnin',
Form salmon mixture into 4, 3 1/2-by-1 inch patties; place on a rimmed baking sheet. Broil, without turning, until browned on top and opaque throughout, 6-7 minutes. Meanwhile, combine yogurt and dill in a small bowl; season with salt and pepper. Serve burgers on buns with yogurt-dill sauce and lettuce.
I think for the better, but it changed things.
Halo
But most important, for the invented group of Arabians!! And based on invented INDEFENSIBLE BORDERS!
Hello everybody!! I am here to do another IMM!! I absolutely love doing these!! It gives me a chance to talk about some awesome books that I got this past week!! I think I stated this in my very first post that my friends and family aren't book lovers, so when I get new books I don't really have anybody to share my excitement with...till now that is! :)
For Hana and Friends Lost
I give Wuthering Heights I liked this book. I'm glad I got a chance to read another classic. Not too many books that give you love,hate,torture,death, and ghosts all in one. This story I was reading on my nook (nookbook) I wish that others get to enjoy this classic as much as I did. I gave 4 stars just because for me it was a bit hard to follow.
No hello, no how are you, no excuse me, just straight to the unnecessary point. Because here is the thing, being a Nigerian would have no impact on his following questining, which was
DT: A plain straw hat is fine by me. They never seem to last though. I've had my current one for a couple of years now, which has to be a record.
While over on the island we went into the Discovery Centre and watched the 10 Little Penguins get fed. When we were talking to the Ranger after the feeding she was telling us how old the penguins were - the oldest is 19 years old!! Can you believe it! They all look so young and so little....
Vampire Bats (2005)
With apologies to my few regular readers as to my absence, I will try to post more as time permits. Besides, the silly season of Iowa politics is nearly upon us: the new session at the statehouse and, of course, the caucuses. Iowa's mother's milk for a revenue generating scheme upon the American voters.
The experiment on decomposition of food led Tiger to wonder about digestion of food in the body and whether the process of food being broken down by stomach acids is similar to what we have observed in experiment (4). We reckon they are similar. I think we will come back to this topic when we study human biology a little later.
‘Given the cuts already from nondefense appropriations, the real House focus is on protecting the Pentagon. There would be a massive 13 percent, $62 billion shift of resources to defense under Ryan’s plan’.
I need a SMALL break. Whew!
The north–south orientation of the River Nile on the African continent ensures extreme variability in climate between the extremes of the basin. The Nile Basin receives annually an average rainfall of about 650 mm, or a total of about 1,900 bcm per year. Long-term mean annual flow at Aswan is about 85 bcm per year, making the annual runoff coefficient of the basin around 4.5 percent. This figure is small and, for example, is just 10 percent of that of the Rhine. The reason for this is found largely in those parts of the basin belonging to the arid and hyper-arid zones that are large in surface area, and contribute only negligibly to basin runoff. With losses from major swamp areas as well, up to 30 percent of the rainfall the Nile Basin receives in an average year is lost before being used for any purpose.
by Douglas Messerli
My first attempt in Long Exposures. After watching A Lot Like Love with a former paramour I asked him if we could go on a Photodate. Of course, he said yes.
Either a Beginner or advanced photographer, Sony offers a easy-to-use digital cameras, the chic and cheap.
I went into defensive mode -- scooping up our little pet, whom just about any other dog could bite in half like a McNugget -- a concern of which she is blissfully unaware. She squirmed in my arms to get down and barked at the shadow in the dark.
To all my followers and visitors, thank you very, very much! And as my way of saying thank you, I will come up with a BLOGOVERSARY CANDY as a small treat! Stay tuned for it.
3) Send $1.50 in money order or check for each card at *
He is one of more than 60 animals to be found at Paseo los Monos, in the Ecuadorian Amazon.
Eric Burdon -vocals
Section 17 of the Act confers special powers with the concerned authority wherein passing of award may be dispensed with and yet permits to take possession of the land notified for acquisition. Further holding of enquiry can also be waived, as envisaged under section 5 A of the Act. However, such powers can be exercised only in case of urgency. After passing of the award, the person whose land has been proposed to be acquired can give his consent for such acquisition and agree to receive the compensation.
Have you tried any Nyx products? What do you think?
Yippee!!!!!
But we did not! The city provided each household with a specific ration of bread made from small amounts of flour and large proportion of chaff. Each member of the household was allowed to buy a one-third of the loaf. For the three of us at home that worked out to less than a very small loaf per day, or roughly three small slices per person. As the war dragged on this would seem like a feast.
Trademarks: Called Andy "Ange."
For Gravy:
The cards are blank inside so that they can be used for a variety of occasions: birthdays, thank you notes, whatever you wish!
In the craft basket: Oh My! What isn’t in there?? I am currently working on making paper beads.
I don't know if you can relate to my son's struggle, but I can. I've been there and done that, figuratively speaking. I have tried on callings and opportunities and paths and talents that were definitely not my own. I have worn shoes others have placed on me and found myself frustrated. I have looked longingly and with awe at the sparkle and success of someone else's life, someone else's road and stood so sure that those shoes would be just right. But they're not. They weren't made for me.
The man, known as Mr CG, had convictions for a middle-range drink-driving offence in 2001 and a low-range offence in 2008. When he applied for a position as a market analyst with RailCorp in 2009 he was told he was not offered the position because of his criminal record, despite having met all the selection criteria and being the selection panel's preferred candidate.
Oy vey, was my first thought. I love to cook so I am happy to “patchke” in the kitchen when I am preparing a meal. So she really challenged me with this. So while I am probably not going to devote an entire drop-down to “the 15-minute meal” (What does she think? I’m Rachel Ray?!), I will post my one of quickest chicken recipes here.
Quality Ideas To Help Expand Your Home Business in SmartHomeBusiness.net
The pattern is called "Exquisite Baby Cap" and it can be found in "The Tatter's Treasure Chest".
Other airlines have application procedures in which customers may be able to get their money back if they can show a reasonable cause. Hanni recommended Meekins file a complaint with the Depatment of Transportation.
In some ways it was surreal, there is Eric Peterson(of Corner Gas fame on CBC) having a chat. And a pint crosses the dance floor for host Seamus O Regan, host of Canada AM on CTV. Then the main draw, star of Republic of Doyle and co-founder of the Company Theatre, Allan Hawco is there cradling a pint of Guinness and chatting to everybody. Kim Stockwood is belting out a rendition of the classic Newfoundland song, "Now I'm sixty four." Oh how I long for those bright days, to come again once more~it was truly a down home celebration with the audience loudly joining in on the chorus and swaying to the music.
It wouldn't have been the joyful celebration it was without each and every
Row 5: ch3 (counts as a first hdc), *(skip 1 ch stitch, hdc in next ch, ch1)* repeat from *, join with a sl st in the top of ch3
Now onto to the challenge! It's a nice easy one for you. We'd like to see something flowery. This can be flowery papers, flowery embellishments, an image of flowers, you know even flowery wording would work!!! The possibilities are endless so let's see something flowery!!!
01: Aerosol – Excess (06:53)
Having the opportunity to do minicourse week was huge. I did circus skills one year, and did Vision Quest twice. That was pretty amazing. Having small classes and a really strong science education really helped with my music. There is a lot of support for free thinking and outside-the-box thinking, and that’s definitely what I got here. Also being exposed to new things at special assemblies. Zakir Hussain performed while I was here. It was my first exposure to tabla. I studied at Ali Akbar College of Music after seeing them perform at MA as a student, and then went on to Berklee College of Music.
Urban 1C = 13%; inbreeding coefficient = 0.0081
Carson has been doing really well without the feeding tube. We thought we would pull the tube and see if we can get him to eat orally BEFORE doing the permanent G tube. His asthma seems to be under control for the first time since April/May. But this week he has been running high fevers and throwing up. I took him to the doctor and he probably has strep so he is on a Z pack for 5 days.
Have your own copy of The Guidon. It will help you learn about what your cadet is going through. You can download it from the website or purchase a copy at the campus bookstore.
It’s been labelled as a ’4D’ movie – exactly how is it ’4D’? I’ve heard rumours of a scratch and sniff card you get when you buy your ticket – and the movie tells you when to use it…
The last time I showed you a picture of our entry, it was in pretty sad shape. Empty frames and of course, that dresser in front of the vent had many of you worried. . . .
Now, more than 15 years after Mr. Johnson’s death, he is unpacking them, one box at a time, and cataloging their contents.
They can watch all kinds of shite,
“I actually live in Ballybough myself and it’s common place for people to walk kids to school in pyjamas,” he says “My own view is that it’s acceptable to a degree, you know I just think it’s part of Dublin and I just laugh at it.”
Keke Palmer
I discovered the answer is yes. I need more commitment, commitment to carrying out God's plan and not my own. I need more faith instead of skepticism. I need more perseverance to not give up when the way looks hopeless. I need an attitude that reflects the decision to be totally sold out to God and not comfortable with the status quo.
zest of two lemons
Amen!
Our doorbell only rang one time! There were about 10 jr. high girls, some in costume, some not. I gave them candy anyway, they were very polite and giggly!
They reminded us about how important it is to have a neonatal probe for sats monitoring of the smallest patients, and they’re right – so we’re reminding you in turn that Lifebox offers a neonatal wrap probe for just US$25 (no shipping fee, when you buy at the same time as the oximeter).
Za’atar
The Carolina Panthers just announced a move that might not sound like much, but it has the potential to have some implications in the defensive secondary.
mr savannah is concerned about my well being (bless his heart) but he is a gazillion miles away, so while i appreciate the sentiment, i'm still making my own soup and whining about it..and feeling miserable...whatever that blue funk was that infected the universe the other day ( ya'll know who you are) it is still lingering and seems to be living in my house today...
1 tsp. cloves
And it looked great for about five minutes.
7) No matter the age, children are never too old for a cuddle.
Even if you think someone was mean to you, being mean back is not a safe way to handle the problem. Instead, get help from an adult you trust.
Micheal is the type of homosexual that gives all of us a black eye. He is every negative stereotype rolled into one nasty, vile little queen. Snow White's stepmother comes off looking like Anne of Green Gables next to this cunt.
To the smell of breastfeeding
(The first given evidence for a differentiation, between traditional Jewish “Shabbat” observance and the religious observance of the first day of the week, appears in Acts 20:7 where the disciples met and “broke bread” together. The Apostle John also refers to the “Lord’s Day” (“kuriake hemera”) in Rev. 1:10.
Presbyterians for Peace
“I get you,” I said, pausing to emphasize the brevity of our exchange, “...man.”
■Farm Kid #2
027.037 YUSUFALI: "Go back to them, and be sure we shall come to them with such hosts as they will never be able to meet: We shall expel them from there in disgrace, and they will feel humbled (indeed)."
All that was offered me was a life of fear, of resentment, of bitterness, of dependance...
Soon he found the cause of all the excitement, and became excited himself. Recent rainfall had knocked over a tree. Rain in the Peten region had only two settings: on and off. The area saw no drizzles, showers or sprinklings. Rain either thundered down like a waterfall, or not at all. In fact, atop a pyramid you could see the rain coming in like a gray wall, a spot of twilight moving across the sky. Earlier that morning a torrent had come down for about forty minutes. That forty minutes had apparently been enough to fell an old, rotten tree on a hillside near where he was working.
It’s interesting noting that Hillary touts her “experience” and Obama’s lack thereof as reasons she is more prepared. In a speech on Monday excerpted in the Chicago Tribune: "We've seen the tragic result of having a president who had neither the experience nor wisdom to manage our foreign policy and safeguard our national security. We can't let that happen again. America has already taken that chance one time too many."
Week total miles: 45
My birthday was on a Wednesday this year, which meant that no one was free to do anything with me beyond wish me a happy birthday on Facebook. Well, that’s not entirely true: one of my housemates bought me a slice of cheesecake. People especially weren’t able to spend a late night dancing, which is what I wanted to do.
Back in the naughty noughties a fifty-one-year-old Baptist minister was found dead in his Alabama home wearing not one but two wet suits and sundry bits of exotic rubber underwear, with a dildo up his arse. (The cover-up of the doubly-covered-up deceased finally fell before a Freedom of Information Act request.)"
Spring is here
Set in the early years of the New Republic and the New Jedi Order, when Luke Skywalker's Jedi Academy is still based on Yavin IV. Scourge follows the adventures of Jedi Archivist Mander Zuma as he investigates the violent death of his former Padawan.
a squat Sir Walter Raleigh’s which contained
I was scribbling in wilderness
- Add butter, 1 tablespoon at a time, mixing until combined after each addition. Mix until dough is smooth, shiny, and elastic, about 10 minutes. If dough is very sticky and wet, add up to ½ cup flour (only the bottom quarter of the dough should stick to the bowl); mix until combined. Transfer dough to buttered bowl. Cover with a clean kitchen towel, and let rise at room temperature until almost doubled in bulk, about 1 ½ hours. Punch down dough; cover with plastic wrap, and refrigerate overnight (at least 12 hours).
21. Rainer Maria Rilke "The Notebooks of Malte Laurid Brigge"
p.p.s SDR threw Astoria in the air to play with her and she cried the saddest cry I've ever heard. Too soon Dan. too soon.
In this post I will also include some of the biblical references where they apply.
I'm offering up this cute little boy's hat from my store (there is never enough cute boy stuff, right?)
After yesterday's mega-post, I'm keeping it super short tonight with a brief discussion of a single word: xenium.
About three weeks have passed since we left Atticus in Hounded. And like any action-packed novel worth it’s weight in gold, Hexed gets Atticus in trouble real fast and real bad. It doesn’t slow down from there.
Rayloth took a moment to focus on the clouded message the Force was trying to pull his attention to. Something about this felt wrong, as if he were heading into a room he knew was full of something dangerous; with a blindfold on.
Ink: Black Stazon
Happy 1st Blog Anniversary to me!!!!
From myself.
we'll go fishing in the crawfish hole
For a complete list of showcases, panels, groovy activities visitwww.americanamusic.org
Mitch: Do you need the spelling for ‘Prix Lumiere?’
Until I joined the US Navy and they stationed me in Hawaii. I was sooo concerned about my hay fever, there is no first frost in Hawaii! But I changed. I started to own my own power, much to the dismay of the Navy. I refused to follow stupid orders (and my god they can hand out some life depleting orders) and for my 10 month history in that crazy organization I went to two Captain’s Masses (not where any sailor wants to go lol) I never had hay fever again. Of course, I did get pregnant in Hawaii too, and for the first time in all my life, I started to really understand and feel and make choices serving LOVE!
I was thrilled when this task came up - a chance for me to give a little back. :)
Agent Russo is pissed off with Mancuso'f ridiculous game.
Congratulations Deonna. Please email us at ccayrblog at hotmail dot com to claim your prize.
Voters in the city must approve any changes to the pension system. City Manager David Cavazos tells the Arizona Republic he hoped to get a proposal on November’s ballot. But that is likely not going to happen because of the judge’s ruling.
Another fun tidbit, Granite's very first baby trainer (before he was under tack) messaged me today to ask about the boy. How sweet?! I told her (touch wood) that Granite is coming along nicely, has been staying healthy, and I am really enjoying him. I am so very lucky. I love my job, my boyfriend is always amazing, my new apartment and new city are treating me well, my bff is close by, and the critters are (currently) healthy and happy. So blessed.
Above: A pic of the final print. it is a three color, limited edition silkscreen. A ginormous THANKS goes out to Mr. James Heimer for the printing! (Go buy something from him please.)
Apparently, FNC did not intend to make the same mistake as CNN did when it introduced its new show for its beautiful blonde, Paula Zahn, eight years ago. I.e., FNC did not want its own version of the infamous “zipper” promo. In that instance, when CNN controversially previewed its then new show, American Morning, with Zahn, a male voice-over announced her as “provocative, super-smart, oh yeah, and just a little sexy: then, as the word “sexy” flashed on the screen, the seeming sound of an unseen zipper opening could be heard. (CNN pulled the ad posthaste after the ensuing media uproar.)
Blue shirted chap: “Wow, cool, your first Mac?”
She was always there when I needed her. She has lived a life full of warmth and meaning.
There was no reasoning with her. I tried explaining again that my phone was brand new and that there is no way I could have been phoning her nightly for the past 2 months. But my pleadings and sincere efforts to quell her anger fell on deaf ears. She abruptly hung up leaving Sue and myself absolutely nonplussed at the vehement torrent of heated emotion that had broken the serene environment so carefully cultivated over the previous couple of hours.
1- Ac/Dc Rapid battery Charger(Great for vacation!)
CIOs need to ask themselves how they can help the business through leveraging IT to create competitive advantage. I covered this in my post, Leveraging IT for Competitive Advantage – Myth or Reality?
covered in earth.
One person calling himself Joshua Irwin writes: “let the xenophobia commence, bloody agents Uruguayans, I am gonna set Malema on your asses.’
A career as a makeup artist is both personally and financially rewarding. Great makeup classes allow you to invest in your future and open doors to the glamorous, behind-the-scenes world of glamour, celebrity, and fashion.
I have a very romantic attachment to this burg, and I think David shares that feeling in his book. In fact, I think those that are on the verge of giving up on this town might want to pick it up as a sort of, disgust panacea. It'll cure what ails you and remind you that this place is made from pure magic... even if its inhabitants are black-wearing, frowny-faced, closet linebackers. (I still love them, it's okay, I used to wear sweatshirts and jeans to work -- nobody's perfect.)
Just own the night like the 4th of July
“Let me say to Atty. Gen. Holder, I welcome an opportunity to have a dialogue with you about ‘cowardice’ anywhere anytime. Why don’t we have the dialogue in Detroit and see if Atty. Gen. Holder has the courage to talk about the failure of the Detroit school system, the failure of the Detroit teachers’ union, the betrayal of the future of thousands of young people. Let’s discuss the total failure of the Detroit political system which has taken a city of 1,800,000 with the highest per capita income in the United States and has driven it into the ground so there are now fewer than 900,000 people there with a per-capita income that is 62nd in the United States. And it’s the function of bad government, bad politicians, bad bureaucracy, and bad ideas.”
448130 Children’s & infants’ clothing stores
Amanda was smart as a whip with an attention span to match. She was curious and independent and loved having people around. She still does. She loved her baby dolls. When I brought my middle daughter home after she was born Amanda stood on the porch proclaiming "my baby doll, my baby doll!", as she saw me draw near with her baby sister in my arms.
Answer / End / Reject call.
One problem: Who the #%@ is F. Martinella? Many others on the blogosphere have tried to come up with some information of this supposedly venerable company, but their Google searches have come up empty. I've searched every database and newspaper archive I can think up. Zilch. I'm pretty familiar with most of the old businesses in the City and this Martinella rings no bells. Something fishy's going on.
Alterations: French seams (as I mentioned) since the material was sheer and ultra-ravelly. I narrowed the collar and the sleeve cuffs a bit, more-or-less successfully. I attached the ruffles differently; I was going to just shorten them (since I think they look too long in the original) but I wound up finishing both edges and sewing the gathering seam about 1 cm in from one side.
The old man wore thick lenses compiled from odd bits of twisted metal that made his eyes frog like, he was dressed in almost rags but so many layers of them it was hard to see where one set started and another ended. By this time Coal had identified him as harmless and had twisted his hips painfully through the gap. He stood up and faced the old man
Materials : Quality Thick Jersey Cotton (Top Notch)
One of the greatest parts of my job as Resident Camp Director is interviewing and hiring staff for the summer. This school year we rolled out the application in late December, a little earlier than usual, and within a few weeks I had more than 50 applications in my inbox! It’s incredibly encouraging to see so many young people who have “come up through the ranks” in their CJ lives, and are excited to pass on the traditions and help create memories for the campers who walk the paths of Camp Jorn today. It’s also fun to see applications from “new” people, people who are passionate about the camping experience and want to make a difference in the lives of kids.
It took Obama a day to disavow his commitment to a united Jerusalem. It took him a little longer to disavow his commitment to “Never Again.”
MIDDLE LAYER OF THE EXPLOSION BOX:
Condolences were extended across the political board and opposition parties have withdrawn no-confidence motions and bills calling to dissolve parliament and move to early elections in respect of the week of mourning.
And that same difference in taste will, I hope, mean a buyer for this new listing at 25 Hettifred, asking $1.190 million for a 1966 raised ranch on an acre. I like King Merritt Acres well enough, I suppose, but I’m not at all sure I’d pay that much for this spot. Fortunately, I’m not a potential buyer.
I cheered LB on the whole way, and miraculously, she found MANY more energized moments. She would see people cheering, or a landmark like Paul Brown Stadium, or I'd tell her one more turn and then we'd be headed back the way she came, and all of a sudden she would BOLT. I'd run, too, with my heart probably beating at the top of its range, and then we'd walk again. LB was fascinated that we got to run under the highway bridges. I taught her that you don't have to stop and stay at the water table to drink it, and she seemed to relish being able to throw her cup on the ground. I told her that she needed to go out for track when she was older because she was one awesome sprinter. We stopped to pose for a picture, taken by the GOTR volunteer rounder-upper, who then laughed as LB took off again and I broke into a full sprint to stay with her. She seemed to feel pretty good about passing 2 miles, and soon we could see the Purple People Bridge. Just on the other side of that bridge, I told her. I asked her if she ever thought she'd run 3 miles and she grinned and shook her head. I said even one mile is far. "One mile is ok," she said, "but three is a challenge!"
Origen: Or, what He says, “And cast him out of the vineyard,” seems to me to be this; As far as they were concerned they judged Him a stranger both to the vineyard, and the husbandmen. “When therefore the Lord of the vineyard cometh, what will he do unto those husbandmen?”
Still, in the light of what could or might happen, what was a forty minute detour to go via Swindon and buy some time?
I can vouch for Andrew and confirm that he is a top guy, as well as being a kick ass writer. We were on the same course at Bath Spa and, honestly, if it wasn't for him I definitely, DEFINITELY would never have passed the hellish film module I took in my first year. It was doomed from the start but somehow I managed to pass wtih Andrew's help. Actually, somehow I managed to get two marks off of a first, go figure. So a much delayed, big fat thank you, dude, for arriving at my flat armed with vodka and shit loads of awesome ideas. Or did I supply the vodka? Either way, I've just whisked a copy of Elsa's Reality off to my Kindle and you folks should too. What else could you buy with 77p? 3 and a bit Freddos (remember when they were 10p? I do)? A pint of milk?! I have no idea what milk costs. You know what else you can buy? A YA fantasy short story named Elsa's Reality. Bargain.
On September 21, 2006, Sgt. Johnson’s husband, Officer Rodney Johnson, was making a routine traffic stop when he was shot and killed by Juan Leonardo Quintero-Perez, a previously deported Mexican national who had reentered and was living in the U.S. illegally. After reentering the U.S. illegally, Quintero-Perez had multiple interactions with the HPD before shooting and killing Officer Johnson, including at least one arrest for driving under the influence and citations for failing to stop and give information following an accident and driving with a suspended license.
That’s when I knew something had gone wrong. I have yet to find any evidence that they starved to death in their basket, or froze to death in the frigid night air, but I don’t need any to suspect the worst. The moment the buwaas began with the fairy-tales, I knew they were only telling the bhidesi what he wanted to hear, like their children talking to me about organization and unity when I really wanted to talk to them about money.
Who would you have voted for? I think we can all agree Moldova got robbed. God Bless Europe and goodnight.
And today I manage to put yet another year behind me and the girls made sure I had a lovely breakfast and plenty of presents this morning. A tradition in our house is that the birthday person gets to choose dinner and have it made for them but as I tap away here the forecast nasty weather is just beginning to break. As I am a volunteer with the local State Emergency Service unit I expect that tonight might be interrupted by a few call outs from the public and dinner may have to wait for another day. Plus, I don’t fancy driving in this weather if I don’t absolutely have to and so it might just be left over party pies and ‘little boys’ from the party for us.
7. Scott Gomez had a difficult time downloading George Laraque’s book to his IPhone. The result? Really … Do you need to ask?
to grasp its warmth.
Passing West Palm Beach airport during the week, I spied The Trumpster's Boeing 757 sitting proud amongst all the other fancy-pants jets. Trump is there quite often, given that he owns Mar-A-Lago, an historic pile on frou-frou Palm Beach.
I need to interject my excuses and redeem myself by saying, "I'm recommiting time."
~Yield about 8 shrimp omelets.
To them it must have seemed that the Duke lacrosse case was sent to them by God, except that few of such people would actually have believed in Him. To sustain belief in a lie it is not enough to rely forever on undocumented historical legends and conspiracy cover ups. Faith will only take a disciple so far, to hook them for life you need an example, or as those teachers and professors seeking to guide young minds to the new Utopia might put it, you need a teachable moment.
The Mormon Church spent Millions of dollars to defeat the Equal Rights Amendment beginning in the 1920′s and has not changed its stance on it, so Mitt can agree with that demand from the right. They are also in agreement when it comes to stopping women from making their own choices on contraception,conception, and other health issues while eliminating funding for Planned Parenthood.
“One, please!”
The large proportion of autistics recently reported to have exceptional skills (Howlin et al., 2009) would be judged as less “severe” if they lost those skills. Exceptional skills are considered to increase “severity” (that is, atypicality) in autism, not decrease it. This would also likely be true of autistic cognitive strengths which have been revealed in the peer-reviewed literature in comparisons between the performance of autistics and nonautistics on a wide range of tasks (I have started compiling an inventory of these, which was the subject of an IMFAR 2009 poster). Indeed, at IMFAR 2009, the loss of exceptional autistic abilities (Eigsti et al., 2009; from Deborah Fein’s group) was reported as evidence for “optimal outcomes” in autism.
The recall may affect several brands that are widely distributed at pet specialty stores, supermarkets, mass retailers, as well as other retail and wholesale outlets.
We're so happy you could join us for this month's Getting Cricky Design Team Blog Hop!! We have an EXTRA SPECIAL hop for you this month -- For the past week we've been celebrating the BRAND NEW additions to our Getting Cricky team by showcasing some of our FAVORITE K Andrew Designs Stamp Art Sets... And NOW, we'd like for you to get to know more about us and our very special Guest Designer (and former Getting Cricky Design Team Sister), Larelyn from Handmade from My Heart!!
Like so many things that happen in my life, my temporary lapse in judgment has turned out to be an unexpected blessing. This superficial need of mine to be validated sent me down a very unexpected and meaningful train of thought. Just what am I trying to say here in this space I have created? Am I ready to make a few changes so I can connect more clearly with you, my friends and my readers? How does this blog of mine fit into the grander picture I have for my life, for my family’s life? Oh, there is so much more reflection to be done, so much more reading to do, so many more plans to dream up.
On the other hand, I can’t help but find it sad that these structures serve now as soulless offices, filled with tacky desks, drab beige filing cabinets, and jumbles of electrical cords, that the huge dining rooms will never again play host to family feasts and that the drawing room rugs will never be rolled up for dances. Historic preservation can only go so far, I suppose. We can save the artifacts of our past, but we’ll never be able to regain the past itself.
S appeared in a Carnatic music festival competition here in the town and I just signed her up for experience as it is just months since we started regular lessons for her. I coached her on how she should introduce herself and the Geetham she is to sing and we worked on it the day before the competition so much. But she woke up with a strained voice and a bad cold on the day of the competition. Still we took her and she was the first to be called upon. One of the judges asked her what she was going to sing and she just answered him and straight off started the Geetham without the introductions and the Aalab that preludes it. She did do a good job but I was plenty upset with her for not listening to me and disregarding all that I taught her. We stayed back for the next 10 participants who were all good and did the introduction and everything well. On the way back home, we were doing a postmortem of all that went wrong that morning and believe me, drawing limits on parenting and being nice all the time is difficult. I was upset more because, in spite of the good job she did she was going to miss all the points for presentation.. Anyway we did not take her to the prize announcement ceremony the next day and guess what happened, she did win the third prize among the 25 participants and most of the others were much older to her as well. Now she has a Trophy that says Carnatic Star and she had a smug smile on her face all the day, but she was nice enough not to tell me “See Lady, what happened?” but “May be I would have got the first prize if I had done what you told me to”. So that is my sweet girl S!
All our love to Letizia Mancino, Mary Holmes, Tigerli and the Betty MacDonald Fan Club fans in 35 countries,
Together
These cuts would set back the Pennsylvania State System of Higher Education to funding levels not seen since 1989-90. That’s right — Corbett is trying to send our universities back to the 1980s. Just for fun, try to remember where you were in 1989… For reference’s sake, it was the year of the Tiananmen Square uprising and the Berlin Wall coming down. The Billboard Hot 100 Song of the Year was “Look Away” by Chicago. “Saved by the Bell” was in its first season.
For only the second time in 30 years this April has been different. Whilst we have still received our average 500mm (20″) of rain, it all fell during 6 days, and for the remainder of the time GOF’s Paradise looked something like this;
